    Edi Hienrich | Herbalife Ltd | ZoomInfo.com


HLF Edi Hienrich Insider Trades for Herbalife Ltd.


































Bulletin






Investor Alert





















Expand
Keep Open
Close






Expand
Keep Open
Close






Expand
Keep Open
Close






Expand
Keep Open
Close






Expand
Keep Open
Close































Herbalife Ltd.

                  NYSE: HLF
          



GO



Set Alerts
Find a Broker




Join TD Ameritrade




Market Index


 

Overview
      
Profile
      
News
      
Charts
      
Financials
      
Historical Quotes
      
Analyst Estimates
      
Options
      
SEC Filings
      
Insiders
      


/marketstate/country/us

Herbalife Ltd.



After Hours
 --Quotes are delayed by 20 min
Jul 28, 2017, 5:15 p.m.


HLF

/quotes/zigman/361145/composite


$
67.30




Change

+0.06
+0.09%

Volume
Volume 2,806
Quotes are delayed by 20 min








/quotes/zigman/361145/composite
Today's close

$
			67.60
		


$
				67.24
			
Change

-0.36
-0.53%





Day low
Day high
$66.82
$67.75










52 week low
52 week high

            $47.62
        

            $74.49
        


















Insider Activity


Individual




Edi Hienrich



Mr. Edi Hienrich is Senior Vice President & MD-EMEA Region at Herbalife Ltd.



Transactions


Date
Shares
Transaction
Value





05/11/2017
8,631


 
Disposition at $71.74 per share.


619,188


05/09/2017
5,488


 
Disposition at $73 per share.


400,624


05/09/2017
10,378


 
Derivative/Non-derivative trans. at $72.81 per share.


755,623


05/09/2017
4,991


 



363,395


05/09/2017
24,000


 
Derivative/Non-derivative trans. at $15.14 per share.


363,360


08/10/2015
1,390


 
Disposition at $59.89 per share.


83,248


08/10/2015
1,635


 
Disposition at $59.89 per share.


97,921


08/07/2015
343


 
Disposition at $60 per share.


20,580


08/07/2015
1,670


 



100,200


08/07/2015
3,060


 
Derivative/Non-derivative trans. at $6.82 per share.


20,869


08/07/2015
5,487


 
Disposition at $60 per share.


329,220


08/07/2015
1,965


 



117,900


08/07/2015
3,600


 
Derivative/Non-derivative trans. at $6.82 per share.


24,552


09/04/2012
3,234


 
Derivative/Non-derivative trans. at $48.39 per share.


156,494


09/04/2012
43


 
Award at $0 per share.


0





        Copyright 2017 FactSet Research Systems Inc. All rights reserved. Source FactSet Fundamentals.
    











            Officers and Executives
        





Mr. Michael O. Johnson 
Executive Chairman




Mr. Richard P. Goudis 
Chief Executive & Operating Officer




Mr. Desmond J. Walsh 
President




Mr. John G. DeSimone 
Chief Financial Officer




Mr. Frank  Lamberti 
Executive Vice President & Managing Director




Dr. Rocio  Medina 
Vice President-Worldwide Nutrition Training




Dr. Andrew  Shao 
Vice President-Global Nutrition Policy




Mr. Patricio  Cuesta 
Vice President-South America




Ms. Ibelis Inglewood Fleming 
Senior Vice President & MD-North America Region




Dr. John O. Agwunobi 
Chief Health & Nutrition Officer




Mr. Brett R. Chapman 
Strategic Advisor




Mr. Alan L. Hoffman 
Executive Vice President-Global Corporate Affairs




Dr. John  Heiss 
Director-Sports & Fitness




Dr. Vasilios H. Frankos 
SVP-Global Product Science, Safety & Compliance




Mr. Tyrone D. Bland 
Vice President-Government Relations




Ms. Monica  Wood 
Vice President-Consumer & Distributor Insights




Ms. Angela  Arboleda 
VP-Community Engagement & Health Policy




Mr. Edi  Hienrich 
Senior Vice President & MD-EMEA Region




Mr. Ric  Hobby 
Senior VP-Global Government Relations




Ms. Samantha  Clayton 
Director-Worldwide Fitness Education




Mr. John M. Tartol 
Director




Mr. Pedro  Cardoso 
Director




Mr. Robert  Levy 
Executive Vice President-Sales & Marketing




Mr. Shin-Shing  Chiu 
Chief Accounting Officer & Senior Vice President




Mr. Jennifer  Butler 
Vice President-Media Relations




Mr. Alan  Quan 
Vice President-Investor Relations




Mr. Daliea  Mohamad-Liauw 
VP-Asia Pacific Corporate Communications




Mr. Jean Marie Cacciatore 
Senior Vice President-Worldwide Human Resources




Mr. Richard  Werber 
General Counsel




Ms. Pamela Jones Harbour 
Senior Vice President & Legal Officer




Mr. Richard P. Bermingham 
Independent Director




Ms. María  Otero 
Independent Director




Mr. Jeffrey T. Dunn 
Lead Independent Director




Mr. Keith  Cozza 
Independent Director




Mr. Jonathan  Christodoro 
Independent Director




Mr. Michael  Montelongo 
Independent Director




Dr. Richard H. Carmona 
Independent Director




Ms. Jesse A. Lynn 
Independent Director




Mr. James Larry Nelson 
Independent Director




Mr. Hunter Clark Gary 
Independent Director









Trending Tickers


/quotes/zigman/17636479/composite VUZI+15.60%


/quotes/zigman/237947/composite JCP-5.83%


/quotes/zigman/59392505/composite NUGT-2.93%


/quotes/zigman/59386294/composite JNUG-5.94%


/quotes/zigman/65801738/composite TLT+1.11%


X




Powered by














Log In




11:55 PM EDT
July 28, 2017


/marketstate/country/us
New York

	Closed


/marketstate/country/uk
London

	Closed


/marketstate/country/jp
Tokyo

	Closed





/marketstate/country/us
 


/marketstate/country/uk
 


/marketstate/country/jp
 











View All



Latest News

/news/latest
9:16pWall Street isn’t ready for a 1,100-point tumble in the Dow industrials
7:39pBarron's Buzz: Robo 2.0, Facebook and Twitter, Trading On News
7:29pA Wild Week in Washington 
6:32pThe dark side of cruises
6:32pThe highest paid athletes in the world, in one chart
6:31pO.J. Simpson made over $400,000 while in prison and won’t have to give any of it to the Goldman family
6:31p Trump to Police: 'Don't Be Too Nice'
6:31pHere are 10 co-workers you should avoid like the plague — especially in meetings
6:29pTop 10 most annoying people you may want to unfriend on Facebook 
6:29pThis is one person you should never unfriend on Facebook...
6:29p3 horrible ways typos could alter the course of your life
6:27pPaint your bathroom this color and boost your home’s selling price by $5,400
6:27pAmericans’ new badge of honor: ‘I was blocked by a celebrity!’
6:27p5 weird things I found out about America in my first 24 hours 
6:14pBeyond Tesla: 7 stocks driving the autonomous car revolution
6:14pThese 7 highly taxed companies need Congress to finally act on tax reform
6:11pWatch out: ‘Kids’ are making the most money in this stock market 
6:10p7 real ways for millennials to save money (not by brownbagging and skipping Starbucks)
6:09p‘Game of Thrones’: This computer model predicts who will be killed off — or survive
6:09pThis basic balanced index fund is beating the hedge fund averages
Loading more headlines...




dow

/quotes/zigman/627449/realtime
21,830.31

+33.76
+0.15%





nasdaq

/quotes/zigman/12633936/realtime
6,374.68

-7.51
-0.12%





s&p 500

/quotes/zigman/3870025/realtime
2,472.10

-3.32
-0.13%













Kiosk


1352872800000
1352872800000


The RetireMentors






				Retirement advice from our industry experts
				Our team of financial professionals can help you plan and save 
					for retirement, then 
				live well in it.



/conga/kiosk/retirementors.html
361307




1320411600000
1320616500000


Alerts



/conga/kiosk/alerts.html
310238




1333717800000
1333964100000


Virtual Stock Exchange





Our free stock-market game
				• Trade your virtual portfolio in real time
				• Talk strategies in group discussions
				• Find or create a game that suits you
				• Use our learning center to improve 



/conga/kiosk/games.html
310284




1245657600000
1277280000000


Location Scouts




Housing-market insights from our realty pros
																																																							Plus the latest data from Realtor.com on 21 home markets across the U.S.
• See our complete Real Estate site


/conga/kiosk/real_estate.html
357012




1404799200000
1404799200000


Lazy Portfolios





				Set it and forget it
				Check out the returns on our 8 Lazy Portfolios that are made up 
				of low-cost 
				buy-and-hold index funds.

				• How to create your own Lazy Portfolio


/conga/kiosk/lazy_portfolio.html
313134














MarketWatch.com




Site Index
Topics
Help
Feedback
Newsroom Roster

                    Media Archive
Premium Products
Mobile


Company Info
Code of Conduct
Corrections
Advertising Media Kit
Advertise Locally
Reprints & Licensing
Broker Center

                    Your Ad Choices


Follow MarketWatch


































RSS
Podcasts






WSJ.com
Barron's Online
BigCharts
Virtual Stock Exchange


Financial News London
WSJ.com Small Business
realtor.com
Mansion Global












		Copyright © 2017 MarketWatch, Inc.  All rights reserved.
		By using this site, you agree to the Terms of Service,
        Privacy Policy and Cookie Policy.
	



            Intraday Data provided by SIX Financial Information and subject to terms of use. Historical and current end-of-day data provided by SIX Financial Information. All quotes are in local exchange time. Real-time last sale data for U.S. stock quotes reflect trades reported through Nasdaq only. Intraday data delayed at least 15 minutes or per exchange requirements.
        






MarketWatch Top Stories
Link to MarketWatch's Slice.

15






















































EDI Internet, Pick and Pack, HIPPA                      SolutionsConnectpointzEDI Service BureauIntegration ServicesCustom PortalsServicesLogisticsEDI (Electronic Data Interchange)EDI OutsourceEDI ServiceEDI ProviderData MappingVAN ServicesPartnersSupportPayment GatewayLabel Ordering FormAbout UsFAQTestimonialsContactCall: 1-800-228-3282   MenuEDI (Electronic Data Interchange)Why is ACT Data considered the premier EDI provider? EDI Service Bureau Our EDI Internet services are one of the best decisions any business can make for growth. Each of our services is scalable, meaning your “one-man-operation” can grow quickly to the level of Fortune 500 companies. We don’t complicate things with extra log in credentials, or force you to work your way through Web forms. We simply handle your documents as they come into the ACT system, then we translate them to a readable format and deliver them directly to you. ACT Data is a simple, low cost approach to making shipping easier.Webstore Portals from ACT Data manage communications between you and your supply chain. Every order is tracked, then it goes through a pick and pack process without any need for input on your end. ACT Data’s goal is for you to focus on making more sales, not processing them. Nobody can match the power ACT Data brings to order processing online. ACT Data Custom Portals Manage everything from Order Collection, to Shipment Consolidation, to Document Lifecycle. We even handle hipaa compliance. Our custom portals are built to your exact requirements. Call for A free quote.Integration Services specializing in 3PL warehouse/logistics.See why ACT Data has been steadily growing since 1985. Our clients, some of whom come to us after using similar services, sample us and stay. Call 800-ACT-DATA for your quote.   For over 25 years, ACT Data has offered clients the benefits of personalized, professional, and courteous service.Switch over your existing EDI to ACT Data for free!Electronic Data Interchange is all that our EDI service bureau does, and our analysts are experts in both service and compliance. Clients SupplyFor over 25 years our clients have enjoyed the benefits of personalized, professional, courteous service. View all partnersCall now for a free walk-through of our online demo.ACT Data has been considered the best in the business for more than 25 years. Our dear clients stay with us longer than any other service; many come to us after sampling other services. 1-800-228-3282 Contact ACT Data EDI Service Bureau VAN Services Custom Portals Integration ServicesACT Data Process FlowFor over 25 years our clients have enjoyed the benefits of personalized, professional, courteous service.Take care of all communications with your supply chain. Every order and all tracking between your storefronts and your supply chain are processed without any intervention. You focus on making and supporting sales, we take care of the rest. Nobody can match the power we bring to your Webstore order processing. Experience process flow Contact Act Data 17-10 River Road Fair Lawn, NJ 07410 Email: sales@actdata.com Phone: 201-794-1114 Fax: 201-796-4593 Facebook LinkedInSolutionsConnectpointzEDI Service BureauIntegration ServicesCustom PortalsSupportLabel Ordering FormPayment GatewayPrivacy PolicyReturn PolicyInformationPartnersAbout UsTestimonialsFrequently Asked Questions ACT Data Services, Inc. © 2015 All Rights Reserved. Designed & Developed by Taktic Studio      
EDI Internet, Pick and Pack, HIPPA                      SolutionsConnectpointzEDI Service BureauIntegration ServicesCustom PortalsServicesLogisticsEDI (Electronic Data Interchange)EDI OutsourceEDI ServiceEDI ProviderData MappingVAN ServicesPartnersSupportPayment GatewayLabel Ordering FormAbout UsFAQTestimonialsContactCall: 1-800-228-3282   MenuEDI (Electronic Data Interchange)Why is ACT Data considered the premier EDI provider? EDI Service Bureau Our EDI Internet services are one of the best decisions any business can make for growth. Each of our services is scalable, meaning your “one-man-operation” can grow quickly to the level of Fortune 500 companies. We don’t complicate things with extra log in credentials, or force you to work your way through Web forms. We simply handle your documents as they come into the ACT system, then we translate them to a readable format and deliver them directly to you. ACT Data is a simple, low cost approach to making shipping easier.Webstore Portals from ACT Data manage communications between you and your supply chain. Every order is tracked, then it goes through a pick and pack process without any need for input on your end. ACT Data’s goal is for you to focus on making more sales, not processing them. Nobody can match the power ACT Data brings to order processing online. ACT Data Custom Portals Manage everything from Order Collection, to Shipment Consolidation, to Document Lifecycle. We even handle hipaa compliance. Our custom portals are built to your exact requirements. Call for A free quote.Integration Services specializing in 3PL warehouse/logistics.See why ACT Data has been steadily growing since 1985. Our clients, some of whom come to us after using similar services, sample us and stay. Call 800-ACT-DATA for your quote.   For over 25 years, ACT Data has offered clients the benefits of personalized, professional, and courteous service.Switch over your existing EDI to ACT Data for free!Electronic Data Interchange is all that our EDI service bureau does, and our analysts are experts in both service and compliance. Clients SupplyFor over 25 years our clients have enjoyed the benefits of personalized, professional, courteous service. View all partnersCall now for a free walk-through of our online demo.ACT Data has been considered the best in the business for more than 25 years. Our dear clients stay with us longer than any other service; many come to us after sampling other services. 1-800-228-3282 Contact ACT Data EDI Service Bureau VAN Services Custom Portals Integration ServicesACT Data Process FlowFor over 25 years our clients have enjoyed the benefits of personalized, professional, courteous service.Take care of all communications with your supply chain. Every order and all tracking between your storefronts and your supply chain are processed without any intervention. You focus on making and supporting sales, we take care of the rest. Nobody can match the power we bring to your Webstore order processing. Experience process flow Contact Act Data 17-10 River Road Fair Lawn, NJ 07410 Email: sales@actdata.com Phone: 201-794-1114 Fax: 201-796-4593 Facebook LinkedInSolutionsConnectpointzEDI Service BureauIntegration ServicesCustom PortalsSupportLabel Ordering FormPayment GatewayPrivacy PolicyReturn PolicyInformationPartnersAbout UsTestimonialsFrequently Asked Questions ACT Data Services, Inc. © 2015 All Rights Reserved. Designed & Developed by Taktic Studio      



Microsoft personalized ad preferences




 













To opt out of personalized ads in this browser, your browser history must allow first-party and third-party cookies and you must have your browsing experience set to NOT delete browsing history on exit. Instructions for enabling cookies and configuring your browsing history may be available in your browsers settings, privacy, or help documentation.

















Sign in
















  Hold on… We’re sorry but this didn’t work.                  You can’t turn off personalized ads right now because your browser is currently blocking third-party cookies. We can help you fix this issue.                Let’s get started:  Depending on what browser you use, open Options or Settings.                  Make sure that third-party cookies are not blocked anymore. To find out how, search your browser’s Help.                                 Revisit http://choice.microsoft.com/opt-out, and then on the “Personalized ads in this browser” tile, click Off.                 ext74081 




  About Our Ads To create a more customized online experience, some of the ads you may receive on Microsoft websites and apps are tailored to your previous activities, searches and site visits. You're in control and here's where you can make the advertising choice that's right for you. ext74075 




  Where Can I Learn More about Advertising on Microsoft Websites and Apps? Microsoft partners with Oath, AppNexus and other third party service providers to help present customized content and display advertisements on MSN, Outlook.com and other websites and apps. Microsoft also delivers search ads to Bing and our search syndication partners. Learn more about Microsoft’s privacy practices here. You can learn more about interest-based ads from Oath and AppNexus in their privacy statements: Oath and AppNexus. What Choices Do I Have About Interest-Based Advertising? On this page, you can opt out of receiving interest based advertising from Microsoft. You can also opt out of receiving interest-based advertising from all self-regulatory members, including Microsoft, Oath, AppNexus and other third party ad networks, at the following sites:  In the US: Digital Advertising Alliance (DAA) In Europe: European Interactive Digital Advertising Alliance (EDAA) In Canada: Ad Choices: Digital Advertising Alliance of Canada (DAAC)  You can control interest-based advertising in Windows apps by turning off the advertising ID in Windows Settings.  More choices  Do you want personalized ads from other companies?  Questions? If you have a privacy question or a question for the Chief Privacy Officer of Microsoft, please contact us by using our web form. We will respond to questions within 30 days. ext74076 




       Personalized ads in this browser     OFF    Opt-out is currently unavailable, please try again later.  Control the "personalized ads" setting for this web browser.  Learn more           If you want Microsoft to show ads that might be relevant to you, click On. To show “generic” ads, click Off.          ext74078 




       Personalized ads wherever I use my Microsoft account     OFF   Sign in to change...    Opt-out is currently unavailable, please try again later.  Control the "personalized ads" setting that applies when you are signed in on any computer or device with your Microsoft account, including Windows, Windows phone, Xbox and other devices.  Learn more                    If you want Microsoft to show ads that might be relevant to you, click On. To show “generic” ads, click Off.         If you choose “generic” ads and use a browser, your choice applies to everyone when using that browser as long as you do not clear your cookies.          ext74079 




       Personalized ads in Windows         In your Windows Settings, you can turn off personalized ads that appear in apps on this device. You’ll still see ads, but they won’t be personalized anymore.     If you have Windows 8.1:            Access the charms by touching or moving your pointer to the right edge of the screen.                 Click or tap Settings, and then click or tap Change PC Settings.                 Click or tap Privacy, and then turn off Let apps use my advertising ID for experiences across apps.          If you have Windows 10:            Click or tap the Start button.                 Click or tap Settings.                 Click or tap Privacy, and then turn off Let apps use my advertising ID for experiences across apps.          If you have a Windows mobile device:            Go to Settings.                 Tap on Privacy.                 Tap on Advertising ID, and then turn off Let apps use my advertising ID for experiences across apps.                If you want to turn off personalized ads from Microsoft wherever you use your Microsoft account including apps on Windows, Windows Phone, Xbox and other devices, you can do so by selecting the Microsoft account option above.    ext74080 














Legal
Privacy & Cookies
© 2017 Microsoft









﻿







Edi Hienrich the SVP/Managing Director EMEA of Herbalife Ltd Sold 8,855 Shares – Octafinance

























































 








Friday, 28 July 2017

























 

Menu



Featured News


						2 years ago - Alphabet Inc (NASDAQ:GOOGL) Tests Its Ad Technology On Billboards To Cushion Itself Against Ad Blocks


						2 years ago - China Margin Debt Hits 8-Week High, Japan Pumps’n’Dumps As Kyle Bass Fears Looming EM Banking Crisis


						2 years ago - Marc Faber Shares His Insight in One Hour Exclusive Interview. He Covers All From Commodities and China to Inflation, The Euro and Gold


						2 years ago - Carl Icahn Criticizes the Fed. Feels Bad For Investors Buying Junk Bonds


						2 years ago - John Burbank: European QE Can’t Save The Markets Same As the U.S. Quantitative Easing. Everything Will Be Liquidated










Edi Hienrich the SVP/Managing Director EMEA of Herbalife Ltd Sold 8,855 Shares


08/11/2015  by OctaStaff 
			in Blue Chips, Insider News 












Share with your friendsYour NameYour EmailRecipient EmailEnter a MessageI read this article and found it very interesting, thought it might be interesting for you. The article is called Edi Hienrich the SVP/Managing Director EMEA of Herbalife Ltd Sold 8,855 Shares and is was published by Octafinance.com at http://www.octafinance.com/edi-hienrich-the-svpmanaging-director-emea-of-herbalife-ltd-sold-8855-shares/148631/.CaptchaSubmit
Edi Hienrich Insider Sell Transaction
 Herbalife Ltd SVP/Managing Director EMEA Edi Hienrich on the 11/08/2015 unloaded a total of 8,855 shares of the -listed company with market value around $530,967 U.S. Dollars. This is based on an average price per share of $60.0 U.S. Dollars. This deal was reported on 11/08/2015 and is already filed with the SEC. The public report is available for free to the public here. Edi Hienrich right now has ownership of 860 shares which are equivalent to precisely 0.0009% of the Cayman Islands-based company’s market capitalization (total value of the shares outstanding). 
Herbalife Ltd. Stock Rating, Sentiment and Fundamentals
 It is difficult to make conclusions about Herbalife Ltd’s future just from Edi Hienrich’s sale because in this filing, the insider also revealed option transactions. In the form, it was reported that Edi exercised options for 6,660 shares with average price 6.8, worth 45,421. Five top stock analysts predict that the stock will post $4.67 EPS for the reporting. So the company’s YOY EPS growth is predicted to be 4.80%.






Rating & SentimentPsychSignal Social:SELLAnalysts Rating:BUYHedge Funds Sentiment:SELL




Stock FundamentalsEarnings + FCF Trend:NEUTRALSector/Industry Macro:BULLISHValuation Models:-


 


Technical AnalysisST Trend:UPMT Trend:UPLT Trend:UP




OctaFinance Rating*:NEUTRAL


* Read How Our Stock Ratings System Works








 According to our research and time-momentum model, we rate the company as Neutral. Take a look at the chart below. Within the last 200 days, Herbalife Ltd’s share price has grown by 22.67% and right now is in strong uptrend. 
Price Chart of Herbalife Ltd NYSE:HLF Stock
 
Source: RightEdgeSystems, Yahoo Split & Dividend Adjusted Data and OctaFinance Interpretations
 The consensus among the great traders has always been that a mix of technical and fundamental analysis allows for the highest returns, epitomized by Steven Cohen. This doesn’t look to be the case with Herbalife Ltd.
Hedge Funds Ownership
 Latest 13F filings from SEC disclose 229 hedge funds have shares of Herbalife Ltd. In the last quarter, the company had 87.93% institutional ownership. That is a very high interest. They decreased by 2.54 million the total shares they hold. As of that quarter these stock owners owned 81.32 million shares. A total of 32 funds opened new positions in Herbalife Ltd and 64 increased their holdings. There were 50 funds that closed their positions and 107 that reduced them. 
 As revealed by SEC’s 13F filings, three institutional investors are long big this stock as its in their Top 10 stock holdings.

 Hollencrest Securities Llc had the greatest investment with ownership of 27,638 shares as of Q4 2014 for 0.14% of the fund’s portfolio. Allan Teh’s Kamunting Street Capital Management L.P. is another positive institutional manager having 66,834 shares of the company or 3.85% of their stocks portfolio. The stock is also 0.18% of the fund’s AUM. Moreover William Duhamel’s Route One Investment Company L.P. have 4.80% of their stock portfolio invested in the company for 722,600 shares. The New York-based fund Icahn Carl C revealed it had acquired a stake worth 2.01% of the fund’s stock portfolio in Herbalife Ltd. Rr Partners Lp is also very optimistic about the company, owning 3.18 million shares or 3.76% of their stock portfolio.
Herbalife Ltd NYSE:HLF Company Profile

Herbalife Ltd. is a holding company. The Company is a global nutrition company that develops and sells weight management, healthy meals and snacks, sports and fitness, energy and targeted nutritional products, as well as personal care products. The Company’s products are often sold as part of a program. The Company categorizes its products into five groups: weight management, which includes meal replacement, protein shakes, drink mixes, weight loss enhancers and healthy snacks; targeted nutrition, dietary and nutritional supplements containing quality herbs, vitamins, minerals and other natural ingredients; energy, sports & fitness, consists of products that support a healthy active lifestyle; outer nutrition, consists of facial skin care, body care, and hair care products, and literature, promotional and other, includes Start-up kits, sales tools, and educational materials. As of December 31, 2014, the Company sold its products in 91 countries.
Company Website: Herbalife Ltd
 This company has 7800 employees. Now its market cap is: $5.52 billion and it has 90.83 million shares outstanding. Today it has 108.45% shareholders and the institutional ownership stands at 108.45%. Herbalife Ltd was formed in Null on 2002-04-04. The stock closed at $60.77 yesterday and it had average 2 days volume of 370699 shares. It is down from the 30 days average shares volume of 371567. Herbalife Ltd has a one year low of $27.60 and a 52 weeks high of $61.84. The stock price is above the 200 days SMA. Herbalife Ltd last issued its quarterly earnings stats on 08/05/2015. The company reported 1.24 EPS for the quarter, above the consensus estimate of 1.13 by 0.11. The company had a revenue of 1.11 billion for 3/31/2015 and 1.13 billion for 12/31/2014. Therefore, the revenue was -28,187,000 down.
* This transaction was effected pursuant to a Rule 10b5-1 trading plan adopted by the reporting person on May 30 – 2015.
* This transaction was effected pursuant to a Rule 10b5-1 trading plan adopted by the reporting person on June 4 – 2015.
* These stock appreciation rights were fully vested as of February 27 – 2012.

Receive News & Ratings Via Email - Enter your email address below to receive a concise daily summary of the latest news and analysts' ratings with MarketBeat.com's FREE daily email newsletter.







 
Tagged: Edi HienrichHerbalife Ltd - (NYSE:HLF)



Jazz Pharmaceuticals plc – Ordinary Shares (NASDAQ:JAZZ)’s director Norbert Riedel Unloaded 801 shares of the Company BroadSoft Inc (NASDAQ:BSFT)’s Stock Insider Transaction – John Markley Sold 1,500 Shares 



 





Free Email Newsletter
    Enter your email address below to get the latest news and analysts' ratings for your stocks with our FREE daily email newsletter:







Hedge Fund NewsTop 10 CITADEL ADVISORS 13F Holdings in Q3 2015DF DENT & CO INC Just Released Its Q3 2015 Stock PositionsMAVERICK CAPITAL Top 10 Holdings in Q3 2015Analyzing Ken Griffins CITADEL ADVISORS Stock Holdings in Q3 2015LONE PINE CAPITAL Top 10 13F Positions in Q3 2015Guru NewsFelix Zulauf Sees a Stock Market Correction Coming. This Rally S&P 500 (INDEXSP:.INX) Will Be Short-LivedMarc Faber Shares His Insight in One Hour Exclusive Interview. He Covers All From Commodities and China to Inflation, The Euro and GoldJim Grant: The Next Thing Might Be Helicopter Money. What to Buy and Where He Sees Investment OpportunitiesKyle Bass Bearish on Emerging Markets for at least 2 More Years. Looking to Short CurrenciesDavid Tepper Gets Defensive. Is it Time to Get Out of The Stock Market?


Macro NewsChina Margin Debt Hits 8-Week High, Japan Pumps’n’Dumps As Kyle Bass Fears Looming EM Banking CrisisAre US – Russian Relations A Zero-Sum Game?US and Russia have launched direct talks on the conflict in SyriaYuan Drops as PBOC Cuts Reference Rate by Most Since DevaluationCould the market crash like 1987?—put volume spike argues low is nearCTAs NewsRed Rock Just Published Report About The Trend Following Landscape & How CTAs’ Performance Must Be AnalyzedHow to Implement Dual Momentum for non-US InvestorsDo Commodity Trading Advisors (CTAs) Really Provide Crisis Alpha, Equity Hedge and Are Long Volatility?






















Microsoft personalized ad preferences




 













To opt out of personalized ads in this browser, your browser history must allow first-party and third-party cookies and you must have your browsing experience set to NOT delete browsing history on exit. Instructions for enabling cookies and configuring your browsing history may be available in your browsers settings, privacy, or help documentation.

















Sign in
















  Hold on… We’re sorry but this didn’t work.                  You can’t turn off personalized ads right now because your browser is currently blocking third-party cookies. We can help you fix this issue.                Let’s get started:  Depending on what browser you use, open Options or Settings.                  Make sure that third-party cookies are not blocked anymore. To find out how, search your browser’s Help.                                 Revisit http://choice.microsoft.com/opt-out, and then on the “Personalized ads in this browser” tile, click Off.                 ext74081 




  About Our Ads To create a more customized online experience, some of the ads you may receive on Microsoft websites and apps are tailored to your previous activities, searches and site visits. You're in control and here's where you can make the advertising choice that's right for you. ext74075 




  Where Can I Learn More about Advertising on Microsoft Websites and Apps? Microsoft partners with Oath, AppNexus and other third party service providers to help present customized content and display advertisements on MSN, Outlook.com and other websites and apps. Microsoft also delivers search ads to Bing and our search syndication partners. Learn more about Microsoft’s privacy practices here. You can learn more about interest-based ads from Oath and AppNexus in their privacy statements: Oath and AppNexus. What Choices Do I Have About Interest-Based Advertising? On this page, you can opt out of receiving interest based advertising from Microsoft. You can also opt out of receiving interest-based advertising from all self-regulatory members, including Microsoft, Oath, AppNexus and other third party ad networks, at the following sites:  In the US: Digital Advertising Alliance (DAA) In Europe: European Interactive Digital Advertising Alliance (EDAA) In Canada: Ad Choices: Digital Advertising Alliance of Canada (DAAC)  You can control interest-based advertising in Windows apps by turning off the advertising ID in Windows Settings.  More choices  Do you want personalized ads from other companies?  Questions? If you have a privacy question or a question for the Chief Privacy Officer of Microsoft, please contact us by using our web form. We will respond to questions within 30 days. ext74076 




       Personalized ads in this browser     OFF    Opt-out is currently unavailable, please try again later.  Control the "personalized ads" setting for this web browser.  Learn more           If you want Microsoft to show ads that might be relevant to you, click On. To show “generic” ads, click Off.          ext74078 




       Personalized ads wherever I use my Microsoft account     OFF   Sign in to change...    Opt-out is currently unavailable, please try again later.  Control the "personalized ads" setting that applies when you are signed in on any computer or device with your Microsoft account, including Windows, Windows phone, Xbox and other devices.  Learn more                    If you want Microsoft to show ads that might be relevant to you, click On. To show “generic” ads, click Off.         If you choose “generic” ads and use a browser, your choice applies to everyone when using that browser as long as you do not clear your cookies.          ext74079 




       Personalized ads in Windows         In your Windows Settings, you can turn off personalized ads that appear in apps on this device. You’ll still see ads, but they won’t be personalized anymore.     If you have Windows 8.1:            Access the charms by touching or moving your pointer to the right edge of the screen.                 Click or tap Settings, and then click or tap Change PC Settings.                 Click or tap Privacy, and then turn off Let apps use my advertising ID for experiences across apps.          If you have Windows 10:            Click or tap the Start button.                 Click or tap Settings.                 Click or tap Privacy, and then turn off Let apps use my advertising ID for experiences across apps.          If you have a Windows mobile device:            Go to Settings.                 Tap on Privacy.                 Tap on Advertising ID, and then turn off Let apps use my advertising ID for experiences across apps.                If you want to turn off personalized ads from Microsoft wherever you use your Microsoft account including apps on Windows, Windows Phone, Xbox and other devices, you can do so by selecting the Microsoft account option above.    ext74080 














Legal
Privacy & Cookies
© 2017 Microsoft












Microsoft personalized ad preferences




 













To opt out of personalized ads in this browser, your browser history must allow first-party and third-party cookies and you must have your browsing experience set to NOT delete browsing history on exit. Instructions for enabling cookies and configuring your browsing history may be available in your browsers settings, privacy, or help documentation.

















Sign in
















  Hold on… We’re sorry but this didn’t work.                  You can’t turn off personalized ads right now because your browser is currently blocking third-party cookies. We can help you fix this issue.                Let’s get started:  Depending on what browser you use, open Options or Settings.                  Make sure that third-party cookies are not blocked anymore. To find out how, search your browser’s Help.                                 Revisit http://choice.microsoft.com/opt-out, and then on the “Personalized ads in this browser” tile, click Off.                 ext74081 




  About Our Ads To create a more customized online experience, some of the ads you may receive on Microsoft websites and apps are tailored to your previous activities, searches and site visits. You're in control and here's where you can make the advertising choice that's right for you. ext74075 




  Where Can I Learn More about Advertising on Microsoft Websites and Apps? Microsoft partners with Oath, AppNexus and other third party service providers to help present customized content and display advertisements on MSN, Outlook.com and other websites and apps. Microsoft also delivers search ads to Bing and our search syndication partners. Learn more about Microsoft’s privacy practices here. You can learn more about interest-based ads from Oath and AppNexus in their privacy statements: Oath and AppNexus. What Choices Do I Have About Interest-Based Advertising? On this page, you can opt out of receiving interest based advertising from Microsoft. You can also opt out of receiving interest-based advertising from all self-regulatory members, including Microsoft, Oath, AppNexus and other third party ad networks, at the following sites:  In the US: Digital Advertising Alliance (DAA) In Europe: European Interactive Digital Advertising Alliance (EDAA) In Canada: Ad Choices: Digital Advertising Alliance of Canada (DAAC)  You can control interest-based advertising in Windows apps by turning off the advertising ID in Windows Settings.  More choices  Do you want personalized ads from other companies?  Questions? If you have a privacy question or a question for the Chief Privacy Officer of Microsoft, please contact us by using our web form. We will respond to questions within 30 days. ext74076 




       Personalized ads in this browser     OFF    Opt-out is currently unavailable, please try again later.  Control the "personalized ads" setting for this web browser.  Learn more           If you want Microsoft to show ads that might be relevant to you, click On. To show “generic” ads, click Off.          ext74078 




       Personalized ads wherever I use my Microsoft account     OFF   Sign in to change...    Opt-out is currently unavailable, please try again later.  Control the "personalized ads" setting that applies when you are signed in on any computer or device with your Microsoft account, including Windows, Windows phone, Xbox and other devices.  Learn more                    If you want Microsoft to show ads that might be relevant to you, click On. To show “generic” ads, click Off.         If you choose “generic” ads and use a browser, your choice applies to everyone when using that browser as long as you do not clear your cookies.          ext74079 




       Personalized ads in Windows         In your Windows Settings, you can turn off personalized ads that appear in apps on this device. You’ll still see ads, but they won’t be personalized anymore.     If you have Windows 8.1:            Access the charms by touching or moving your pointer to the right edge of the screen.                 Click or tap Settings, and then click or tap Change PC Settings.                 Click or tap Privacy, and then turn off Let apps use my advertising ID for experiences across apps.          If you have Windows 10:            Click or tap the Start button.                 Click or tap Settings.                 Click or tap Privacy, and then turn off Let apps use my advertising ID for experiences across apps.          If you have a Windows mobile device:            Go to Settings.                 Tap on Privacy.                 Tap on Advertising ID, and then turn off Let apps use my advertising ID for experiences across apps.                If you want to turn off personalized ads from Microsoft wherever you use your Microsoft account including apps on Windows, Windows Phone, Xbox and other devices, you can do so by selecting the Microsoft account option above.    ext74080 














Legal
Privacy & Cookies
© 2017 Microsoft















Benefits and Features of Vantage Point EDI and Data Masons Software








































866-575-1631


















What We Offer

ERP Integration

Dynamics 365
Dynamics AX
Dynamics GP
Dynamics NAV
Macola

EDI Solutions

Vantage Point EDI Overview
EDI Workflow Scheduler
Purchase Orders
Invoices
ASN
Planning Schedule/Release
Supply Chain EDI (Supplier Facing)
Remote Warehouse Integration
Transportation Management System
PO Acknowledgement System
Product Activity
Product Catalog
Managed Services
VAN service
Universal Data Translator
Other EDI Transactions

Industries

Consumer Packaged Goods
Automotive
Fresh Produce/Food
Growers
FDA Regulated Pharma & Drug
General Industrial
Fulfillment and Third Party Logistics Providers
Fashion, Apparel, Footwear


Trading Partners
Resources

Becoming a Partner
Buy vs Build
Communications and Protocols
EDI for Cloud
EDI Evaluation Checklist
FAQ
Is Data Masons Right for You
Outsourced Compliance
Product Information Sheets
Standards Organizations
Technology
Top 10 Reasons Companies Choose Data Masons
Webinars, Podcasts, Videos
White Papers

About

About Us
Contact 
Support
Consulting
Case Studies
Testimonials
Press Releases
Partner Alliances
Events
Careers

Blog
























Top 10 Reasons Companies Choose Data Masons

integration without customization
























We know you have a choice to make.
And we hope you'll make it with us.
See the top 10 reasons why customers choose Data Masons, then let us know when you're ready to talk EDI. We'll be here and are ready to help with your EDI initiative.














ERP integration focus
We focus only on EDI and only on ERPs where we have dep expertise.
Data Masons is the industry’s ERP integration expert in addition to having unmatched EDI expertise. The company’s deep knowledge of the Microsoft Dynamics ERP platforms (AX, GP, and NAV) and the Exact Macola solutions removes the risk and excessive costs that are potential hazards when working with companies lacking similar expertise. Compared to any other company in the industry, Data Masons provides the most document integrations to all of these platforms.
“We could tell Data Masons were experts in our Microsoft Dynamics ERP platform during our initial meetings. This was important as we wanted a provider that could help us eliminate customizations we had to build to satisfy the needs of our earlier provider. Our recent version upgrade would have been much more difficult had we not had the Data Masons’ EDI product.”
Gary Godman, CIO, ESI Enterprises














EDI solution vs. tool (no ERP customizations!)
This is how we make EDI simple.
Customers prefer our ‘plug-and-play’ solution that meets EDI integration and compliance requirements. Implementation is a simple set-up process as opposed to a software development project which may put you and your ERP platform at risk. The Vantage Point EDI solution requires no ERP modifications for tight integration and, combined with Data Masons’ library of 8,000+ partner approved maps, you can implement integrated EDI with over 1,200 different businesses quickly and cost effectively.
“Vantage Point EDI proved to be a tightly integrated, out-of-the-box EDI solution that did everything we needed to handle our EDI requirements with no ERP development needed.”
Bill Blyth, Oldcastle Precast














No transaction or document fees
So no "gotcha" expenses you hadn't budgeted for.
Many companies provide seemingly low-cost solutions, but what they also have are unpredictable and, in many cases, exorbitant document and transactions fees. Data Masons gives you the choice to move your data in the manner that best suits your business needs without any unnecessary transaction fees, resulting in lower and more predictable cost.
“When we found out we could do unlimited transaction processing with Wal-Mart and Target using Vantage Point EDI, we dropped our web forms provider and purchased Vantage Point EDI. Our monthly transaction charges went from $3,800 per month to $0. The integration saves us time, money and eliminated errors – the ROI has been tremendous.”
J Wang, Pepsi Bottling, M.V.














End-to-end automation with management by exception
After hours, Vantage Point keeps on working. 
Data Masons provides a ‘lights out’ automated workflow solution that excels in trapping and reporting discrepancies when they happen, a feature that is not available in any other solution in our marketplace. Vantage Point EDI is truly an end-to-end application that runs 24/7/365 without human involvement, except in the case of discrepancies that require a staff member to resolve or approve (e.g. a price discrepancy).
“Our company is a Microsoft shop and we liked the SQL and .NET technology foundation. Reporting has been a dream and we love the flexibility and control SQL provides. The Data Masons’ EDI Scheduler provides “lights-out” automation, audit reports and informative exception alerts which is exactly what we wanted.”
Jeff Perrye, Vice President of Finance, Advantus Corp.














Performance
Our performance keeps up with your volume, no problem.
High volume distributors know that performance can make or break an integrated EDI solution. The Data Masons solution leverages Microsoft SQL multi-server load balancing to provide outstanding performance in extreme transaction volume scenarios.
“On a busy day Ferry-Morse Seed Company must process 5,000,000 sales order lines. Data Masons was the only provider we could find that could guarantee that volume integrated into our Dynamics AX ERP solution. We are very pleased with our decision and the excellent relationship we have with Data Masons.”
Tamra Gargus, EDI Coordinator, Ferry-Morse Seed Company














Accelerated ERP deployments
We don't let EDI slow down your ERP implementation
New ERP implementation projects can be delayed or even derailed by complex EDI integration projects. Our knowledgeable service team can work independently and deploy an integrated solution without distractions to your ERP project.
“We chose Data Masons because we wanted a solution that would not slow down our Dynamics AX deployment. Their staff worked closely as part of our team that made it very easy meet our timetable without worrying about EDI integration or mapping. It was as close to plug-and-play as I could imagine.”
D. Peters, VP of IT, Nucal Foods Corporation














Extensive trading partner integration and compliance
With over 9,800 documents and over 1,800 trading partners, we've got you covered.
Customers get up and running quickly and easily by connecting their ERP system to the supply chain partners including customers, suppliers, public warehouses, freight companies, trading networks, banks, brokers, customs and government agencies.
“We were using three different websites to input EDI data. Data Masons handled all of our partners and eliminated all of the data entry.”
Mitch Buchwalter, Home Stuffings, Inc.














Flexible service levels
We work around your needs now and in the future.
Some companies want to manage EDI operations themselves, from partner communications to mapping compliance. Others want a fully-managed experience without any involvement in EDI- related matters, and then others want something in between. Data Masons provides multiple levels of service that provide your company with the service level that best matches your needs and budget.
“We originally purchased the EDI solution from Data Masons and had them manage all of our compliance. After we completed some major IT initiatives we decided to take over the EDI mapping. We appreciated the fact that Data Masons is willing to support us either way and we’ve found we can create our own integrations and process flows using their mapping without any custom programming.”
Nick Hutchens, IT Manager, good2grow














Industry expertise and support
Knowledgeable consultants combined with Vantage Point EDI’s industry specific features help our customers avoid costly mistakes and spending valuable budget hours training their EDI consultants on how industry partners operate. See the Industries pages to learn more.
“We chose Vantage Point EDI because Data Masons understood our distribution model and industry partners such as Tech Data and Ingram. Also, they had great references.”
Mary Henry, Virtual Iron Software, Inc. 
"Data Masons' unmatched level of industry expertise and superior technology model will go a long way in maximizing our clients' Microsoft investments."
Michael VBurnham, President, Panatrack














Reputation
We're proud of our work, our product and our team members.
By putting the customer first, delivering quality solutions and unparalleled customer service, Data Masons has become the leading EDI provider.
“We heard Data Masons was the best option from several different companies in our industry at a recent user group meeting. We decided to abandon our existing EDI solution based on the feedback we heard from other companies using the Vantage Point EDI solution. They quickly replaced our existing EDI solution and solved many challenges our prior vendor could not address. ”
Hank White, Thunder Creek Industries






























Powerful, reliable, scalable EDI solutions for ERPIntegrated and automated for your EDI initative









Little or no source code changes needed for tight integration







No document or transaction fees







Professional and courteous service from EDI experts







Low risk setup and cost-effective EDI solution


























SATISFIED CUSTOMERS 

"Vantage Point EDI for Dynamics NAV has helped Steiner Enterprises become more efficient and more competitive. We can set up new partners quickly and affordably without problems. The product is very easy to use and support has been excellent. I strongly recommend Vantage Point EDI to any company needing integrated EDI."
-Tom Hicks
PRESIDENT, STEINER ENTERPRISES































Want a demo or just a friendly chat? 
















Sarasota, FL / Sydney, Australia
866.575.1631, option 1
dmsales@datamasons.com




















LinkedIn
Twitter
Google+
Facebook
Blog








© 2017 Data Masons Software  Privacy Policy























































EDI Vendor Checklist - Data Masons
































































EDI is complex. Data Masons makes it simple.
Make sure you're choosing the right EDI vendor with this simple checklist.
Choosing an EDI solution can be a daunting task. Be sure you're starting off asking the right questions, so you can make the best decision for your company.
This checklist will:

Provide the "must ask" questions for your vendors
Guide you as you begin your EDI research
Help you successfully navigate the EDI vendor selection process



































Sarasota, FL / Sydney, Australia
866.575.1631, option 1
dmsales@datamasons.com

















LinkedIn
Twitter
Google+
Facebook
Blog








© 2017 Data Masons Software  Privacy Policy








































Herbalife LTD. (NYSE:HLF) Stock Price, News & Analysis






















    























































































Herbalife LTD. Company Profile (NYSE:HLF)



  






Company Profile



Analyst Ratings



Earnings History



Earnings Estimates



Dividend History



Insider Trade



Headlines



Social Media



Chart






About Herbalife LTD. (NYSE:HLF)
Herbalife Ltd. is a global nutrition company. The Company develops and sells weight management, healthy meals and snacks, sports and fitness, energy and targeted nutritional products, as well as personal care products. Its operating segments are based on geographical operations in six regions: North America; Mexico; South and Central America; Europe, the Middle East, and Africa (EMEA); Asia Pacific, and China. The Company categorizes its products into five groups: weight management, targeted nutrition, energy, sports and fitness, outer nutrition, and literature, promotional and other. As of December 31, 2016, it marketed and sold approximately 140 products encompassing over 4,700 stock keeping units (SKUs) globally. Its product categories include meal replacement; protein shakes; drink mixes; dietary and nutritional supplements containing herbs, vitamins, minerals and other natural ingredients; facial skin care; body care; hair care products; sales tools, and educational materials. 


Industry, Sector and Symbol:

Sector: Retail/Wholesale
Industry: Personal Products - NEC
Sub-Industry: Personal Products
Symbol: NYSE:HLF
CUSIP: G4412G10
Web: www.herbalife.com

Capitalization:Market Cap: $6.13 billionOutstanding Shares: 91,099,000Average Prices:50 Day Moving Avg: $71.42200 Day Moving Avg: $63.3052 Week Range: $47.62 - $74.49


P/E:Trailing P/E Ratio: 23.31Foreward P/E Ratio: 12.12P/E Growth: -30.60Sales & Book Value:Annual Revenue: $4.47 billionPrice / Sales: 1.37Book Value: $2.93 per sharePrice / Book: 22.95


Profitability:EBIDTA: $502.8 millionNet Margins: 5.58%Return on Equity: 262.58%Return on Assets: 14.51%Debt:Debt-to-Equity Ratio: 8.22%Current Ratio: 2.56%Quick Ratio: 2.16%Misc:Average Volume: 1.08 million shs.Beta: 1.22Short Ratio: 22.2

 

Frequently Asked Questions for Herbalife LTD. (NYSE:HLF)
What is Herbalife LTD.'s stock symbol?

Herbalife LTD. trades on the New York Stock Exchange (NYSE) under the ticker symbol "HLF."



How will Herbalife LTD.'s stock buyback program work?

Herbalife LTD. declared that its Board of Directors has initiated a stock repurchase program on Wednesday, April 12th 2017, which permits the company to repurchase $1,500,000,000.00 in  outstanding  shares, according to EventVestor. This repurchase authorization permits the company to repurchase up to 27.1% of its shares through open market purchases. Shares repurchase programs are usually a sign that the company's board believes its stock is undervalued. 



How were Herbalife LTD.'s earnings last quarter?

Herbalife LTD. (NYSE:HLF) issued its quarterly earnings data on Thursday, May, 4th. The company reported $1.24 earnings per share (EPS) for the quarter, beating the Zacks' consensus estimate of $0.87 by $0.37. The business earned $1.10 billion during the quarter, compared to analyst estimates of $1.04 billion. Herbalife LTD. had a net margin of 5.58% and a return on equity of 262.58%. The company's quarterly revenue was down 1.6% compared to the same quarter last year. During the same quarter in the prior year, the firm posted $1.36 EPS.  View Herbalife LTD.'s Earnings History.



When will Herbalife LTD. make its next earnings announcement?

Herbalife LTD. is scheduled to release their next quarterly earnings announcement on Tuesday, August, 1st 2017. View Earnings Estimates for Herbalife LTD..



What guidance has Herbalife LTD. issued on next quarter's earnings?

Herbalife LTD. updated its FY17 earnings guidance on Monday, June, 5th. The company provided EPS guidance of $4.10-4.50 for the period, compared to the Thomson Reuters consensus estimate of $4.61. The company issued revenue guidance of +0.5-3.5% YoY to ~$4.51-4.65 billion, compared to the consensus revenue estimate of $4.64 billion.Herbalife LTD. also updated its Q2 guidance to $0.95-1.15 EPS.



Where is Herbalife LTD.'s stock going? Where will Herbalife LTD.'s stock price be in 2017?

4 equities research analysts have issued 1 year price objectives for Herbalife LTD.'s shares. Their forecasts range from $66.00 to $120.00. On average, they expect Herbalife LTD.'s share price to reach $86.67 in the next year. View Analyst Ratings for Herbalife LTD..



What are analysts saying about Herbalife LTD. stock?

Here are some recent quotes from research analysts about Herbalife LTD. stock: 
1. Pivotal Research analysts commented, "We expect adjusted EPS of $1.14, vs $1.29 LY, down 11.4%. Street consensus is $1.12 and company guidance is for $0.95-$1.15. The 2Q17 will be the most challenging quarter of the year given that volume rose 9% in 2Q16 and was up 13.6% in North America LY. Volume is guided to down 4%-8% and net sales are guided to down 2%-6%. We expect sales to decline 5% and volume to decline 6%." (7/20/2017)
2. According to Zacks Investment Research, "Herbalife is a global network marketing company offering a range of science-based weight management products, nutritional supplements and personal care products intended to support weight loss and a healthy lifestyle.   " (7/4/2017)




Who are some of Herbalife LTD.'s key competitors?

 Some companies that are related to Herbalife LTD. include CarMax (KMX), Tiffany & Co. (TIF), Liberty Interactive Corporation (QVCA), Darden Restaurants (DRI), Metro AG (MTTRY), Chipotle Mexican Grill (CMG), Gap, Inc. (The) (GPS), Kingfisher plc (KGFHY), Domino's Pizza (DPZ), IAC/InterActiveCorp (IAC), Advance Auto Parts (AAP), Nordstrom (JWN), Wm Morrison Sup (MRWSY), Macy's (M), Tractor Supply Company (TSCO), J Sainsbury plc (JSAIY), Kohl's Corporation (KSS) and Marks and Spencer Group Plc (MAKSY).



Who are Herbalife LTD.'s key executives?

Herbalife LTD.'s management team includes the folowing people: Michael O. Johnson, Executive Chairman of the BoardDesmond J. Walsh, PresidentRichard P. Goudis, Chief Executive Officer, Chief Operating OfficerJohn G. DeSimone, Chief Financial OfficerAlan L. Hoffman, Executive Vice President - Global Corporate AffairsPedro Cardoso, DirectorJohn M. Tartol, DirectorRichard P. Bermingham, Independent DirectorRichard H. Carmona M.D., Independent DirectorJonathan N. Christodoro, Independent Director



Who owns Herbalife LTD. stock?

Herbalife LTD.'s stock is owned by a variety of of institutional and retail investors. Top institutional shareholders include Spark Investment Management LLC (0.11%), Bank of Montreal Can (0.06%), Gateway Investment Advisers LLC (0.03%), Aperio Group LLC (0.03%), First National Bank of Omaha (0.02%) and Public Employees Retirement Association of Colorado (0.02%). Company insiders that own Herbalife LTD. stock include Calero Miguel Angel Fernandez, Carl C Icahn, Edi Hienrich, Ibelis Fleming, Jesus Alzarez, John Tartol, Richard P Bermingham and Shin-Shing Bosco Chiu. View Institutional Ownership Trends for Herbalife LTD..



Who sold Herbalife LTD. stock? Who is selling Herbalife LTD. stock?

Herbalife LTD.'s stock was sold by a variety of institutional investors in the last quarter, including Gateway Investment Advisers LLC, Spark Investment Management LLC, Bank of Montreal Can, World Asset Management Inc, Public Employees Retirement Association of Colorado and Bbva Compass Bancshares Inc.. Company insiders that have sold Herbalife LTD. stock in the last year include Calero Miguel Angel Fernandez, Edi Hienrich, Ibelis Fleming, Jesus Alzarez, John Tartol, Richard P Bermingham and Shin-Shing Bosco Chiu. View Insider Buying and Selling for Herbalife LTD..



Who bought Herbalife LTD. stock? Who is buying Herbalife LTD. stock?

Herbalife LTD.'s stock was purchased by a variety of institutional investors in the last quarter, including Great West Life Assurance Co. Can, Russell Investments Group Ltd., Acadian Asset Management LLC and Aperio Group LLC.  View Insider Buying and Selling for Herbalife LTD..



How do I buy Herbalife LTD. stock? 

Shares of Herbalife LTD. can be purchased through any online brokerage account. Popular online brokerages include Vanguard Brokerage Services, TD Ameritrade, E*TRADE, Scottrade, Fidelity and Charles Schwab. 



What is Herbalife LTD.'s stock price today?

One share of Herbalife LTD. stock can currently be purchased for approximately $67.24.


MarketBeat Community Rating for Herbalife LTD. (NYSE HLF)Community Ranking:  3.1 out of 5 (  )Outperform Votes:  317 (Vote Outperform)Underperform Votes:  200 (Vote Underperform)Total Votes:  517MarketBeat's community ratings are surveys of what our community members think about Herbalife LTD. and other stocks. Vote "Outperform" if you believe the stock will outperform the S&P 500 over the long term. Vote "Underperform" if you believe the stock will underperform the S&P 500 over the long term. You may vote once every thirty days.


Analyst Ratings
Consensus Ratings for Herbalife LTD. (NYSE:HLF) (How are Consensus Ratings Calculated?) MarketBeat calculates consensus ratings using the most recent rating from each brokerage that has rated a stock within the last twelve months. Since brokers often use different ratings systems, each rating is normalized to a standardized rating score of 1 (sell), 2 (hold), 3 (buy) or 4 (strong buy). Consensus ratings scores are calculated using the mean average of the number of normalized sell, hold, buy and strong buy ratings. Each stock's consensus rating is derived from its calculated consensus ratings score (0-1.5 = Sell, 1.5-2.5 = Hold, 2.5-3.5 = Buy, >3.5 = Strong Buy). MarketBeat's consensus price targets are a mean average of the most recent available price targets set by each analyst that has set a price target for the stock in the last twelve months.MarketBeat will no longer include ratings and price target data in its consensus calculation if a broker drops coverage and MarketBeat has received a report that coverage was dropped. Ratings from certain research firms that issue ratings using purely quantitative methods (such as Zacks, Vetr and ValuEngine) are not included in consensus calculations. MarketBeat's consensus ratings and consensus price targets may differ from those calculated by other firms due to differences in methodology and available data.Ratings Breakdown: 2 Hold Ratings, 2 Buy RatingsConsensus Rating:Buy (Score: 2.50)Consensus Price Target: $86.67 (28.89% upside)

Analysts' Ratings History for Herbalife LTD. (NYSE:HLF)

Show:  
Only the Most Recent Rating From Each Brokerage
All Ratings For This Stock


DateFirmActionRatingPrice TargetImpact on Share PriceDetails7/20/2017Pivotal ResearchReiterated RatingBuy$120.00Medium6/6/2017Tigress FinancialReiterated RatingBuyLow5/31/2017Citigroup Inc.Boost Price TargetNeutral$66.00 -> $74.00Low8/5/2016SunTrust Banks, Inc.Reiterated RatingNeutral$66.00N/A4/17/2016Canaccord GenuityReiterated RatingNeutralN/A10/12/2015Barclays PLCReiterated RatingBuy$73.00N/A(Data available from 7/28/2015 forward)


Earnings
Earnings History for Herbalife LTD. (NYSE:HLF)Earnings History by Quarter for Herbalife LTD. (NYSE HLF)DateQuarterConsensus EstimateActual EPSRevenue EstimateActual RevenueRelease LinkConference CallDetails8/1/2017$1.10N/A5/4/2017Q1 2017$0.87$1.24$1.04 billion$1.10 billionViewListen2/23/2017Q416$0.97$1.00$1.05 billion$1.05 billionViewN/A11/1/2016Q316$1.09$1.21$18.70 million$1.12 billionViewN/A8/3/2016Q216$1.21$1.29$1.19 billion$1.20 billionViewN/A5/5/2016Q116$1.09$1.36$1.07 billion$1.12 billionViewN/A2/25/2016Q415$0.92$1.19$1.06 billion$1.10 billionViewListen11/3/2015Q315$1.05$1.28$1.16 billion$1.10 billionViewN/A8/5/2015Q215$1.11$1.24$1.15 billion$1.20 billionViewN/A5/5/2015Q115$1.01$1.29$1.09 billion$1.11 billionViewN/A2/26/2015Q414$1.16$1.41$1.17 billion$1.13 billionViewListen11/3/2014Q314$1.51$1.45$1.32 billion$1.26 billionViewN/A7/28/2014Q214$1.57$1.55$1.35 billion$1.31 billionViewListen4/28/2014Q114$1.29$1.50$1.23 billion$1.30 billionViewN/A2/18/2014Q413$1.17$1.29$1.22 billion$1.27 billionViewN/A10/30/2013Q313$1.14$1.41$1.20 billion$1.20 billionViewN/A7/29/2013Q2 2013$1.18$1.41$1.16 billion$1.22 billionViewN/A4/29/2013Q1 2013$1.06$1.27$1.11 billion$1.12 billionViewN/A2/19/2013Q4 2012$1.01$1.05$1.05 billion$1.06 billionViewN/A10/29/2012Q312$1.01$1.04$996.96 million$1.02 billionViewN/A7/30/2012$0.96$1.10ViewN/A4/30/2012$0.81$0.88ViewN/A2/21/2012$0.72$0.86ViewN/A10/31/2011$0.74$0.87ViewN/A8/1/2011$0.83$0.88ViewN/A5/2/2011$1.21$1.43ViewN/A2/22/2011$1.12$1.31ViewN/A(Data available from 1/1/2011 forward)


Estimates
Earnings Estimates for Herbalife LTD. (NYSE:HLF)2017 EPS Consensus Estimate: $4.60QuarterNumber of EstimatesLow EstimateHigh EstimateAverage EstimateQ1 20171$1.35$1.35$1.35Q2 20171$1.10$1.10$1.10Q3 20171$1.19$1.19$1.19Q4 20171$0.96$0.96$0.96(Data provided by Zacks Investment Research)


Dividends
Current Dividend Information for Herbalife LTD. (NYSE:HLF)Most Recent Dividend:3/18/2014Dividend Yield:0.00%Dividend Growth:0.00% (3 Year Average)Payout Ratio:0.00% (Trailing 12 Months of Earnings)  0.00% (Based on This Year's Estimates)0.00% (Based on Next Year's Estimates)Dividend History by Quarter for Herbalife LTD. (NYSE HLF)AnnouncedPeriodAmountYieldEx-Dividend DateRecord DatePayable Date2/18/2014quarterly$0.301.81%2/28/20143/4/20143/18/201410/28/2013quarterly$0.3011/12/201311/26/20137/30/2013quarterly$0.302%8/9/20138/13/20138/27/20134/29/2013quarterly$0.303.02%5/10/20135/14/20135/28/20132/19/2013quarterly$0.303.18%3/1/20133/5/20133/19/2013(Data available from 1/1/2013 forward)


Insider Trades
Insider Trading and Institutional Ownership History for Herbalife LTD. (NYSE:HLF)Insider Ownership Percentage: 4.95%Insider Trades by Quarter for Herbalife LTD. (NYSE:HLF)Transaction DateInsider NameTitleBuy/SellNumber of SharesAverage Share PriceTotal TransactionDetails5/12/2017Calero Miguel Angel FernandezEVPSell30,401$72.02$2,189,480.02  5/11/2017Edi HienrichSVPSell14,119$72.23$1,019,815.37  5/11/2017Jesus AlzarezVPSell1,214$71.53$86,837.42  5/11/2017Shin-Shing Bosco ChiuInsiderSell2,828$71.65$202,626.20  5/10/2017Richard P BerminghamDirectorSell7,510$72.92$547,629.20  5/9/2017Shin-Shing Bosco ChiuInsiderSell2,813$71.90$202,254.70  3/10/2017Carl C IcahnMajor ShareholderBuy372,324$51.35$19,118,837.40  3/2/2017John TartolDirectorSell2,758$56.48$155,771.84  11/8/2016Carl C IcahnMajor ShareholderBuy1,056,069$55.05$58,136,598.45  11/3/2016Carl C IcahnMajor ShareholderBuy1,832,402$54.70$100,232,389.40  8/31/2016Carl C IcahnMajor ShareholderBuy306,846$60.39$18,530,429.94  8/26/2016Carl C IcahnMajor ShareholderBuy2,304,683$59.31$136,690,748.73  8/15/2016Ibelis FlemingSVPSell9,729$64.86$631,022.94  7/15/2016Shin-Shing Bosco ChiuInsiderSell2,000$68.00$136,000.00  5/11/2016Jesus AlzarezVPSell1,475$62.18$91,715.50  5/6/2016Richard P BerminghamDirectorSell7,753$66.00$511,698.00  3/21/2016Shin-Shing Bosco ChiuInsiderSell2,000$63.00$126,000.00  9/21/2015Shin-Shing Bosco ChiuInsiderSell1,686$58.00$97,788.00  11/12/2014Des WalshPresidentBuy5,000$37.73$188,650.00  11/7/2014David PezzulloEVPBuy1,315$38.00$49,970.00  11/7/2014John DesimoneCFOBuy2,630$38.00$99,940.00  11/5/2014David PezzulloEVPBuy1,220$40.98$49,995.60  11/5/2014John DesimoneCFOBuy2,420$41.22$99,752.40  8/12/2014Brett ChapmanInsiderBuy5,100$52.00$265,200.00  8/6/2014Jerry LiDirectorBuy1,000$49.70$49,700.00  8/5/2014David PezzulloEVPBuy7,000$49.34$345,380.00  8/1/2014Robert LevyEVPBuy1,000$52.83$52,830.00  7/31/2014John DesimoneCFOBuy10,000$55.56$555,600.00  7/31/2014Richard GoudisCOOBuy10,700$55.81$597,167.00  7/16/2014Leroy Jr. BarnesDirectorSell18,625$64.45$1,200,381.25  7/7/2014Calero Miguel Angel FernandezEVPSell15,332$65.90$1,010,378.80  6/18/2014Patricio CuestaDirectorSell2,975$64.00$190,400.00  6/13/2014Richard P BerminghamDirectorSell16,000$62.74$1,003,840.00  5/21/2014John TartolDirectorSell50,000$63.38$3,169,000.00  5/7/2014Michael JohnsonCEOSell250,000$60.33$15,082,500.00  2/26/2014Carl Icahnmajor shareholderBuy33,515$66.40$2,225,396.00  1/6/2014Colombe NicholasDirectorSell10,938$77.09$843,210.42  12/23/2013Shin-Shing Bosco ChiuInsiderSell1,989$80.81$160,731.09  5/3/2013Carl C IcahnMajor ShareholderBuy611,354$40.85$24,973,810.90  3/8/2013Carl C IcahnMajor ShareholderBuy322,716$41.45$13,376,578.20  3/7/2013Carl C IcahnMajor ShareholderBuy2,017,264$41.02$82,748,169.28  12/3/2012John TartolDirectorSell7,000$45.57$318,990.00  11/29/2012Richard GoudisCOOBuy45,516$43.89$1,997,697.24  11/16/2012Richard GoudisCOOBuy22,200$44.99$998,778.00  11/12/2012Richard GoudisCOOBuy2,150$46.37$99,695.50  (Data available from 1/1/2013 forward)


Headlines
Headline Trends for Herbalife LTD. (NYSE:HLF)


Latest Headlines for Herbalife LTD. (NYSE:HLF)


Source:


All Sources
Trusted Sources
MarketBeat.com
Bloomberg
MarketWatch
Motley Fool
NASDAQ
Reuters
Seeking Alpha
The Street
The Wall Street Journal
Yahoo Finance




DateHeadlineCan Herbalife (HLF) Keep the Earnings Streak Alive in Q2?finance.yahoo.com - July 28 at 1:04 AMHerbalife LTD. (NYSE:HLF) to Release Earnings on Tuesdaywww.americanbankingnews.com - July 27 at 11:51 AMHerbalife: Shareholders Should Take Profits Now - Seeking Alphaseekingalpha.com - July 26 at 3:48 PMNoteworthy Tuesday Option Activity: S, URBN, HLF - Nasdaqwww.nasdaq.com - July 25 at 7:48 PMImplied FTXG Analyst Target Price: $22www.nasdaq.com - July 24 at 10:38 PMHerbalife: Analysts’ Recommendations and Target Pricefinance.yahoo.com - July 21 at 8:58 PMControversies Surrounding Chipotle, Herbalife Don't Faze This Analyst - Benzingawww.benzinga.com - July 21 at 3:55 PMHerbalife Ltd. breached its 50 day moving average in a Bearish Manner : HLF-US : July 21, 2017finance.yahoo.com - July 21 at 3:55 PMControversies Surrounding Chipotle, Herbalife Don't Faze This Analystfinance.yahoo.com - July 21 at 3:55 PMHerbalife’s Earnings Are Expected to Fall in 2Q17finance.yahoo.com - July 21 at 3:55 PMWhat Could Impact Herbalife’s 2Q17 Sales?finance.yahoo.com - July 21 at 3:55 PMHerbalife LTD. (NYSE:HLF) Receives Consensus Rating of "Buy" from Analystswww.americanbankingnews.com - July 21 at 10:57 AMHerbalife LTD. (NYSE:HLF) Rating Reiterated by Pivotal Researchwww.americanbankingnews.com - July 20 at 8:42 AMHerbalife: A Viable Short - Seeking Alphaseekingalpha.com - July 19 at 2:39 AMHerbalife® Nutrition Introduces New Simply Probiotic to Help Balance Digestive Healthfinance.yahoo.com - July 17 at 11:33 AMHerbalife: A Preview Of Q2 In North America - Seeking Alphaseekingalpha.com - July 15 at 5:11 AMStock Traders Purchase High Volume of Herbalife LTD. Call Options (NYSE:HLF)www.americanbankingnews.com - July 13 at 7:32 AMInvestors Buy Large Volume of Put Options on Herbalife LTD. (HLF)www.americanbankingnews.com - July 7 at 7:06 AMHerbalife LTD. (NYSE:HLF) Rating Lowered to Hold at Zacks Investment Researchwww.americanbankingnews.com - July 5 at 12:56 AMHerbalife Ltd. Announces Second Quarter 2017 Earnings Release Date and Investor Callfinance.yahoo.com - July 3 at 7:03 PMHave You Noticed Potential in Herbalife? Stock Adds 48% YTD - Nasdaqwww.nasdaq.com - July 1 at 5:45 AMHerbalife And The Coming Paradigm Inversion - Seeking Alphaseekingalpha.com - July 1 at 5:45 AMHave You Noticed Potential in Herbalife? Stock Adds 48% YTDfinance.yahoo.com - June 29 at 11:47 PMHerbalife: The Long And Short Of It - Seeking Alphaseekingalpha.com - June 28 at 7:02 PMGlancy Prongay & Murray LLP Continues Investigation on Behalf of Herbalife, Ltd. Investorsfinance.yahoo.com - June 28 at 7:02 PMHerbalife LTD. (HLF) Receives Average Recommendation of "Buy" from Analystswww.americanbankingnews.com - June 26 at 10:15 AMBiden tells Ackman ‘never disrespect’ memory of his dead sonfinance.yahoo.com - June 24 at 6:01 PMHerbalife Nutrition Reaffirms Its Commitment to Diversity and Inclusion and Celebrates Contributions of Immigrant Communityfinance.yahoo.com - June 23 at 3:44 PMHLF August 4th Options Begin Tradingwww.nasdaq.com - June 23 at 5:21 AMTraders Buy High Volume of Call Options on Herbalife LTD. (HLF)www.americanbankingnews.com - June 16 at 8:08 AMHerbalife LTD. Target of Unusually Large Options Trading (HLF)www.americanbankingnews.com - June 16 at 8:08 AMHerbalife: Profiting From The Obesity Pandemic - Seeking Alphaseekingalpha.com - June 15 at 7:56 PMWhy Herbalife Ltd. Stock Jumped 14% in Maywww.fool.com - June 15 at 1:02 PMHerbalife: Now It's The Shareholders' Turn To Feel Cheated - Seeking Alphaseekingalpha.com - June 13 at 10:30 PMHerbalife Nutrition Announces New Appointments to Corporate Leadership Teamfinance.yahoo.com - June 13 at 5:27 PMINVESTOR ALERT: Khang & Khang LLP Announces an Investigation of Herbalife Ltd. and Encourages Investors with Losses to Contact the Firmfinance.yahoo.com - June 13 at 5:27 PMPlanning to Buy Herbalife Ltd. (HLF) Stock? Are You Crazy? - Investorplace.cominvestorplace.com - June 12 at 3:29 PMHerbalife Millionaire Member Provides Restructuring Tell - Seeking Alphaseekingalpha.com - June 12 at 3:29 PMPlanning to Buy Herbalife Ltd. (HLF) Stock? Are You Crazy?investorplace.com - June 12 at 1:01 PMHerbalife Ltd. (HLF) Receives Buy Rating from Tigress Financialwww.americanbankingnews.com - June 11 at 12:46 PMHerbalife: Investors Should Stop Believing You - Seeking Alphaseekingalpha.com - June 9 at 6:07 PMJuly 28th Options Now Available For Herbalife (HLF)www.nasdaq.com - June 8 at 6:40 PMSHAREHOLDER ALERT: Lundin Law PC Announces an Investigation of Herbalife Ltd. and Advises Investors with Losses to Contact the Firmfinance.yahoo.com - June 8 at 6:40 PMEquities Analysts Issue Forecasts for Herbalife Ltd.'s Q2 2017 Earnings (HLF)www.americanbankingnews.com - June 8 at 7:30 AMINVESTOR ALERT: Levi & Korsinsky, LLP Reminds Investors of the Commencement of an Investigation Involving Possible Securities Fraud Violations by the Board of Directors of ...www.businesswire.com - June 7 at 5:14 PMINVESTOR ALERT: Levi & Korsinsky, LLP Reminds Investors of the Commencement of an Investigation Involving Possible Securities Fraud Violations by the Board of Directors of Herbalife Ltd. -- HLFfinance.yahoo.com - June 7 at 5:14 PMHerbalife Scrambles, Hires New Lawyer as Short Interest Boomsfinance.yahoo.com - June 7 at 5:14 PMTraders are piling into Bill Ackman's favorite short betfinance.yahoo.com - June 7 at 10:33 AMSHAREHOLDER ALERT: Pomerantz Law Firm Investigates Claims On Behalf of Investors of Herbalife Ltd. - HLF - PR Newswire (press release)www.prnewswire.com - June 6 at 6:10 PMHLF INVESTOR ALERT: Law Offices of Howard G. Smith Commences Investigation on Behalf of Herbalife, Ltd. Investors - Business Wire (press release)www.businesswire.com - June 6 at 6:10 PM


Social





Chart
Herbalife LTD. (HLF) Chart for Friday, July, 28, 2017




This page was last updated on 7/28/2017 by MarketBeat.com Staff
















































		EDI Solutions and Products | 1EDISource	













































 



















Call an EDI Expert at: (877) 334-9650
Contact Us






toggle menu

menu



EDI Products

EDI Products
Find My Product
Request a Demo
Product Comparison Chart
EDI HQ: EDI Software
AS2 Complete: AS2 Software
EDI MX: Managed EDI
EDI PX: Web-based EDI
IntelligentXchange: Analytics


EDI Services

EDI Services
Training

1EDI University


EDI Consulting

Quickstart EDI
Migration Planning


Customer Support

Support Resources


ERP Integrations
Trading Partner Integrations


Industries

Industries
CPG Manufacturing
CPG Retail
Logistics and Distribution
Transportation
Manufacturing
Healthcare
Business Services


Knowledge Center

Knowledge Center
What is EDI?
What is AS2?
Buyer’s Guide
EDI 101 Guide
Resource Center
EDI Transactions
Case Studies
Webinars


EDI Blog
About

About
Our Story
Our Team
Careers
Become a Partner
Referral Program
Press


 





EDI Software and Solutions For All Businesses
Most EDI solutions are one size fits all. 1EDISource is different, providing flexible and customizable solutions to fit your business needs. Our suite of products provides solutions that are scalable for any size business in any industry, and if you’d rather not manage your own EDI, our experts can do it for you. Below you can view all of our products to see which is the best fit for your unique business needs.
Watch Our Video





Close X








EDI HeadQuarters [HQ]
EDI Headquarters is 1EDISource’s most comprehensive EDI solution. HQ allows you to manage and access your EDI data your way, whether you choose On-Premise or Hosted we can cater HQ to meet your industry specific needs. HQ provides our clients with a scalable and flexible solution which is supported by your EDI experts. HQ provides versatile platforms that allow you to fully leverage integrated ERP solutions and provide visibility for direct conflict resolution to instantly elevate your partner requirements bringing your partner relationships to new levels.
Learn more about HQ







managedXchange [MX]
1EDISource has been automating B2B exchange for more than 25 years, generating benefits for your organization such as streamlined business processes, reduction of manual entry, and more accurate data input for your back office. This is accomplished through our managedXchange platform. MX allows our experienced professional consultants to increase the speed of client onboarding and provide integration options tailored to your unique business needs. Best of all, you retain the option to bring EDI back in house with our HQ solution.
Learn more about MX







partnerXchange [PX]
Do you have new trading partners to connect with and need a quick and easily implemented EDI solution right now? PartnerXchange is the perfect EDI solution for your needs. PX is a cutting edge EDI platform that empowers you to exchange data with your trading partners easily and effectively. By utilizing PX for your business, you’ll gain several advantages such as: configurable alerts to avoid missed deadlines, complete trading partner compliance, a simple intuitive interface to guide users new to EDI and much more.
Learn more about PX







intelligentXchange [IX]
IntelligentXchange is our flagship cloud-based software that provides empowered data through visibility. IX is our EDI translator and transforms complicated EDI data into actionable information for any department. IX immediately limits mistakes and research time while finding opportunities quickly and significantly improves client relationships and revenue. The best part of IX is that it’s a clip on software solution that works with any EDI platform.
Learn more about IX







AS2 Complete
AS2 Complete is the right solution for your data encryption needs. Our AS2 solutions provides secure and reliable access to share EDI files with your partners whether you have 1 or a 100. AS2 enables you to easily set up and manage trading partners, quickly generate certificates, respond and comply with your partner requirements and manage messages through alerts and logs from an inbound and outbound transmission.
Learn more about AS2 Complete





Compare Our Products

	﻿


  partnerXchange®
A Web Based EDI Solution For Small Businesses

 Completely Web-Based
 Review and Respond to customer documents
 Create ship notices and print labels

Learn More

  managedXchange®
An Outsourced EDI Solution Great For Any Size Business

 Outsource your EDI
 Cloud based solution, no infrastructure required
 24/7 monitoring of EDI process
 Full visibility of all your data

Learn More

  EDI HeadQuarters®
A Robust EDI Solution For Complete Control

 Manage your EDI entirely in-house
 On-premise or hosted
 Unlimited transaction volume
 Many trading partners
 Enterprise Level Offering

Learn More

  intelligentXchange®
EDI Visibility Layer That Clips on to Your Current System

 Full visibility of related documents
 Human-readable EDI data
 Accessible EDI for other departments
 Web-based cloud solution

Learn More








Want Insider Knowledge of EDI?
We have lots of helpful resources packed full of data, statistics, tips, a buying checklist and more!
Download Buyer's Guide





 

































		EDI Guide to Finding Your Right EDI Solution | 1EDISource	








































 



















Call an EDI Expert at: (877) 334-9650
Contact Us






toggle menu

menu



EDI Products

EDI Products
Find My Product
Request a Demo
Product Comparison Chart
EDI HQ: EDI Software
AS2 Complete: AS2 Software
EDI MX: Managed EDI
EDI PX: Web-based EDI
IntelligentXchange: Analytics


EDI Services

EDI Services
Training

1EDI University


EDI Consulting

Quickstart EDI
Migration Planning


Customer Support

Support Resources


ERP Integrations
Trading Partner Integrations


Industries

Industries
CPG Manufacturing
CPG Retail
Logistics and Distribution
Transportation
Manufacturing
Healthcare
Business Services


Knowledge Center

Knowledge Center
What is EDI?
What is AS2?
Buyer’s Guide
EDI 101 Guide
Resource Center
EDI Transactions
Case Studies
Webinars


EDI Blog
About

About
Our Story
Our Team
Careers
Become a Partner
Referral Program
Press


 






EDI Buyer's Guide
1EDISource can help optimize EDI solutions for your organization. Our EDI Buyer’s Guide provides insightful resources and recommendations for evaluating your EDI infrastructure, including:

Why use EDI?
New to EDI insight and direction to increase efficiency of your current system.
Understanding all aspects of EDI: Communication, Data Management, Translation, Integration and Mapping
Finding the best EDI solution for your industry



Download Buyer's Guide




















													First Name
													*


													Last Name
													*























											Your Email

											*













											Company















											Phone Number

											*













											Why are you here ? (Choose one)
											*


--None--
Request Expert
Need EDI Solution
Education/Training
Education
Research
Beginning Research
Research for Future
Student















													Download
													
												









 










Companies Who Trust 1EDISource










 

































		EDI Outsourcing & Managed EDI Services | managedXchange [MX]	















































 



















Call an EDI Expert at: (877) 334-9650
Contact Us






toggle menu

menu



EDI Products

EDI Products
Find My Product
Request a Demo
Product Comparison Chart
EDI HQ: EDI Software
AS2 Complete: AS2 Software
EDI MX: Managed EDI
EDI PX: Web-based EDI
IntelligentXchange: Analytics


EDI Services

EDI Services
Training

1EDI University


EDI Consulting

Quickstart EDI
Migration Planning


Customer Support

Support Resources


ERP Integrations
Trading Partner Integrations


Industries

Industries
CPG Manufacturing
CPG Retail
Logistics and Distribution
Transportation
Manufacturing
Healthcare
Business Services


Knowledge Center

Knowledge Center
What is EDI?
What is AS2?
Buyer’s Guide
EDI 101 Guide
Resource Center
EDI Transactions
Case Studies
Webinars


EDI Blog
About

About
Our Story
Our Team
Careers
Become a Partner
Referral Program
Press


 





Need to Outsource EDI? Let Us Manage it For You
 managedXchange®
EDI is critical to the success of your business. It’s where your most important revenue-generating documents are exchanged. With managedXchange (MX), a cloud-based solution, you can rely on the experts at 1EDISource to manage your EDI exchange and stay EDI compliant, allowing you to focus on your core business. With our managed services and 24/7 support, you can rest assure that your most important business relationships are being looked after while lowering your overall IT investment.
Watch Our Video





Close X








Trust Our EDI Experts to Manage EDI for You
EDI Trading Partner Management
Complete management of your trading partner’s technical requirements.
Reliable Communications
Each trading partner may need to be communicated with differently through a VAN, secure FTP, AS2 protocol or other means; we handle them all on your behalf.
Scalable Architecture and Cloud-Based EDI Solutions
With state of the art infrastructure, be confident that your documents will flow seamlessly with your trading partner.







Rely on an EDI Process that is Tailored to Your Business
Tailored EDI Integration
Every business’ processes are different and even how you use common back office systems are unique. Rely on an EDI data integration process tailored to your unique business needs.
EDI Implementation Services
Each new client is brought online with dedicated implementation consultants that get to know you and your business.







Maintain Full Awareness of Your Documents with this Cloud-Based EDI Feature
Document Visibility Portal
EDI is more than just a technical function, but a critical step in your business processes, gain full visibility of the documents as they are exchanged and they are accessible to anyone in your organization.
Understand Your EDI Data
Our highly intuitive visibility portal represents EDI as business documents relevant to your customer service and accounting teams to be able to research and solve time sensitive business issues.
Ongoing Services
Your business is not static, so as your processes change be assured your EDI partner is available to continue to evolve your EDI data integration process to accommodate your changing needs.







The Service and EDI Support You Expect
24/7 Expert Support
Our team of EDI experts will manage all of your transactions, trading partner setups and more while you focus on the rest of your business.
Save Time and Money
Eliminate the hassle of recruiting, training, hardware, security and hosting.
Flexible EDI Solutions
At any time you can choose to bring EDI back in-house seamlessly and we can help you do it.





	
	
	﻿

Compare MX To Our Other EDI Products

  partnerXchange®
A Web Based EDI Solution For Small Businesses

 Completely Web-Based
 Review and Respond to customer documents
 Create ship notices and print labels

Learn More

  managedXchange®
An Outsourced EDI Solution Great For Any Size Business

 Outsource your EDI
 Cloud based solution, no infrastructure required
 24/7 monitoring of EDI process
 Full visibility of all your data

Request A Demo

  EDI HeadQuarters®
A Robust EDI Solution For Complete Control

 Manage your EDI entirely in-house
 On-premise or hosted
 Unlimited transaction volume
 Many trading partners
 Enterprise Level Offering

Learn More

  intelligentXchange®
EDI Visibility Layer That Clips on to Your Current System

 Full visibility of related documents
 Human-readable EDI data
 Accessible EDI for other departments
 Web-based cloud solution

Learn More






Want more information about MX?

							Click Here						




 

































		EDI Solutions and Products | 1EDISource	













































 



















Call an EDI Expert at: (877) 334-9650
Contact Us






toggle menu

menu



EDI Products

EDI Products
Find My Product
Request a Demo
Product Comparison Chart
EDI HQ: EDI Software
AS2 Complete: AS2 Software
EDI MX: Managed EDI
EDI PX: Web-based EDI
IntelligentXchange: Analytics


EDI Services

EDI Services
Training

1EDI University


EDI Consulting

Quickstart EDI
Migration Planning


Customer Support

Support Resources


ERP Integrations
Trading Partner Integrations


Industries

Industries
CPG Manufacturing
CPG Retail
Logistics and Distribution
Transportation
Manufacturing
Healthcare
Business Services


Knowledge Center

Knowledge Center
What is EDI?
What is AS2?
Buyer’s Guide
EDI 101 Guide
Resource Center
EDI Transactions
Case Studies
Webinars


EDI Blog
About

About
Our Story
Our Team
Careers
Become a Partner
Referral Program
Press


 





EDI Software and Solutions For All Businesses
Most EDI solutions are one size fits all. 1EDISource is different, providing flexible and customizable solutions to fit your business needs. Our suite of products provides solutions that are scalable for any size business in any industry, and if you’d rather not manage your own EDI, our experts can do it for you. Below you can view all of our products to see which is the best fit for your unique business needs.
Watch Our Video





Close X








EDI HeadQuarters [HQ]
EDI Headquarters is 1EDISource’s most comprehensive EDI solution. HQ allows you to manage and access your EDI data your way, whether you choose On-Premise or Hosted we can cater HQ to meet your industry specific needs. HQ provides our clients with a scalable and flexible solution which is supported by your EDI experts. HQ provides versatile platforms that allow you to fully leverage integrated ERP solutions and provide visibility for direct conflict resolution to instantly elevate your partner requirements bringing your partner relationships to new levels.
Learn more about HQ







managedXchange [MX]
1EDISource has been automating B2B exchange for more than 25 years, generating benefits for your organization such as streamlined business processes, reduction of manual entry, and more accurate data input for your back office. This is accomplished through our managedXchange platform. MX allows our experienced professional consultants to increase the speed of client onboarding and provide integration options tailored to your unique business needs. Best of all, you retain the option to bring EDI back in house with our HQ solution.
Learn more about MX







partnerXchange [PX]
Do you have new trading partners to connect with and need a quick and easily implemented EDI solution right now? PartnerXchange is the perfect EDI solution for your needs. PX is a cutting edge EDI platform that empowers you to exchange data with your trading partners easily and effectively. By utilizing PX for your business, you’ll gain several advantages such as: configurable alerts to avoid missed deadlines, complete trading partner compliance, a simple intuitive interface to guide users new to EDI and much more.
Learn more about PX







intelligentXchange [IX]
IntelligentXchange is our flagship cloud-based software that provides empowered data through visibility. IX is our EDI translator and transforms complicated EDI data into actionable information for any department. IX immediately limits mistakes and research time while finding opportunities quickly and significantly improves client relationships and revenue. The best part of IX is that it’s a clip on software solution that works with any EDI platform.
Learn more about IX







AS2 Complete
AS2 Complete is the right solution for your data encryption needs. Our AS2 solutions provides secure and reliable access to share EDI files with your partners whether you have 1 or a 100. AS2 enables you to easily set up and manage trading partners, quickly generate certificates, respond and comply with your partner requirements and manage messages through alerts and logs from an inbound and outbound transmission.
Learn more about AS2 Complete





Compare Our Products

	﻿


  partnerXchange®
A Web Based EDI Solution For Small Businesses

 Completely Web-Based
 Review and Respond to customer documents
 Create ship notices and print labels

Learn More

  managedXchange®
An Outsourced EDI Solution Great For Any Size Business

 Outsource your EDI
 Cloud based solution, no infrastructure required
 24/7 monitoring of EDI process
 Full visibility of all your data

Learn More

  EDI HeadQuarters®
A Robust EDI Solution For Complete Control

 Manage your EDI entirely in-house
 On-premise or hosted
 Unlimited transaction volume
 Many trading partners
 Enterprise Level Offering

Learn More

  intelligentXchange®
EDI Visibility Layer That Clips on to Your Current System

 Full visibility of related documents
 Human-readable EDI data
 Accessible EDI for other departments
 Web-based cloud solution

Learn More








Want Insider Knowledge of EDI?
We have lots of helpful resources packed full of data, statistics, tips, a buying checklist and more!
Download Buyer's Guide





 

































		AS2 Software and Solutions for Data Encryption | 1EDISource	











































 



















Call an EDI Expert at: (877) 334-9650
Contact Us






toggle menu

menu



EDI Products

EDI Products
Find My Product
Request a Demo
Product Comparison Chart
EDI HQ: EDI Software
AS2 Complete: AS2 Software
EDI MX: Managed EDI
EDI PX: Web-based EDI
IntelligentXchange: Analytics


EDI Services

EDI Services
Training

1EDI University


EDI Consulting

Quickstart EDI
Migration Planning


Customer Support

Support Resources


ERP Integrations
Trading Partner Integrations


Industries

Industries
CPG Manufacturing
CPG Retail
Logistics and Distribution
Transportation
Manufacturing
Healthcare
Business Services


Knowledge Center

Knowledge Center
What is EDI?
What is AS2?
Buyer’s Guide
EDI 101 Guide
Resource Center
EDI Transactions
Case Studies
Webinars


EDI Blog
About

About
Our Story
Our Team
Careers
Become a Partner
Referral Program
Press


 


AS2 Complete – Data Encryption Software

AS2 Complete is the secure solution for your data encryption needs.

AS2 communications made effortless. Establish a secure connection quickly and simply, and begin sending and receiving data with your AS2 partners immediately. AS2 Complete is our advanced software that complies with AS2 standards making it easy for you to communicate secure EDI and other data, create and manage certificates, handle data encryption and decryption and more. From one partner or even 100, AS2 Complete is the easy and
reliable way to share EDI files with your trading partners.
Check out our Getting Started Guide (PDF) to learn more.

Our AS2 Software Enables You to do the Following


Easily set up and manage trading partners
Quickly generate certificates
Respond and comply with your customers’ requirements/initiatives
Manage messages automatically, with alerts and logs keeping track of inbound and outbound transmissions


Features and Benefits of AS2 Complete


Quick and easy installation
Intuitive interface
Powerful search function
Full range of licensing options
Supports both message and SSL encryption
Supports up to 256 Bit Encryption (Compliant with FDA Requirements)
Eliminates Van Fees by communicating directly with your partners


AS2 Complete Technical Specifications

For more details on installation in your particular environment, contact us or call 1-877-334-9650.
PROCESSOR – 32-bit/64-bit; 2 Gigahertz or faster processor recommended
OPERATING SYSTEM – Microsoft Windows 7; Microsoft Windows 8; Microsoft Windows Server 2008; Microsoft Windows 2008 R2; Microsoft Windows 2012; Microsoft Windows 2012 R2; Microsoft Windows 2016
MEMORY – 1 Gigabyte of RAM; 2 Gigabytes or more recommended
HARD DISK – 5 Gigabytes or more recommended
PREREQUISITES – Microsoft .NET Framework 4.5.2 or higher; Internet connection with a static IP address that is accessible to the public Internet
OTHER REQUIREMENTS – Administrative access (for installation); Microsoft SQL Server 2008 or Higher (optional) including Microsoft SQL Server 2014, Microsoft SQL 2016
INTERNET – AS2 Complete requires outbound access on port 80 and 443 for licensing the software. EDI/HQ will attempt to contact the following addresses:

license.1edisource.com
license2.1edisource.com
service.1edisource.com

AS2 Complete can be configured to listen for incoming messages on any port with Port 4080 (most commonly used)


Learn More About AS2 CompleteContact us today to consult with one of our AS2 experts.
Contact Us  


 

































		EDI Outsourcing & Managed EDI Services | managedXchange [MX]	















































 



















Call an EDI Expert at: (877) 334-9650
Contact Us






toggle menu

menu



EDI Products

EDI Products
Find My Product
Request a Demo
Product Comparison Chart
EDI HQ: EDI Software
AS2 Complete: AS2 Software
EDI MX: Managed EDI
EDI PX: Web-based EDI
IntelligentXchange: Analytics


EDI Services

EDI Services
Training

1EDI University


EDI Consulting

Quickstart EDI
Migration Planning


Customer Support

Support Resources


ERP Integrations
Trading Partner Integrations


Industries

Industries
CPG Manufacturing
CPG Retail
Logistics and Distribution
Transportation
Manufacturing
Healthcare
Business Services


Knowledge Center

Knowledge Center
What is EDI?
What is AS2?
Buyer’s Guide
EDI 101 Guide
Resource Center
EDI Transactions
Case Studies
Webinars


EDI Blog
About

About
Our Story
Our Team
Careers
Become a Partner
Referral Program
Press


 





Need to Outsource EDI? Let Us Manage it For You
 managedXchange®
EDI is critical to the success of your business. It’s where your most important revenue-generating documents are exchanged. With managedXchange (MX), a cloud-based solution, you can rely on the experts at 1EDISource to manage your EDI exchange and stay EDI compliant, allowing you to focus on your core business. With our managed services and 24/7 support, you can rest assure that your most important business relationships are being looked after while lowering your overall IT investment.
Watch Our Video





Close X








Trust Our EDI Experts to Manage EDI for You
EDI Trading Partner Management
Complete management of your trading partner’s technical requirements.
Reliable Communications
Each trading partner may need to be communicated with differently through a VAN, secure FTP, AS2 protocol or other means; we handle them all on your behalf.
Scalable Architecture and Cloud-Based EDI Solutions
With state of the art infrastructure, be confident that your documents will flow seamlessly with your trading partner.







Rely on an EDI Process that is Tailored to Your Business
Tailored EDI Integration
Every business’ processes are different and even how you use common back office systems are unique. Rely on an EDI data integration process tailored to your unique business needs.
EDI Implementation Services
Each new client is brought online with dedicated implementation consultants that get to know you and your business.







Maintain Full Awareness of Your Documents with this Cloud-Based EDI Feature
Document Visibility Portal
EDI is more than just a technical function, but a critical step in your business processes, gain full visibility of the documents as they are exchanged and they are accessible to anyone in your organization.
Understand Your EDI Data
Our highly intuitive visibility portal represents EDI as business documents relevant to your customer service and accounting teams to be able to research and solve time sensitive business issues.
Ongoing Services
Your business is not static, so as your processes change be assured your EDI partner is available to continue to evolve your EDI data integration process to accommodate your changing needs.







The Service and EDI Support You Expect
24/7 Expert Support
Our team of EDI experts will manage all of your transactions, trading partner setups and more while you focus on the rest of your business.
Save Time and Money
Eliminate the hassle of recruiting, training, hardware, security and hosting.
Flexible EDI Solutions
At any time you can choose to bring EDI back in-house seamlessly and we can help you do it.





	
	
	﻿

Compare MX To Our Other EDI Products

  partnerXchange®
A Web Based EDI Solution For Small Businesses

 Completely Web-Based
 Review and Respond to customer documents
 Create ship notices and print labels

Learn More

  managedXchange®
An Outsourced EDI Solution Great For Any Size Business

 Outsource your EDI
 Cloud based solution, no infrastructure required
 24/7 monitoring of EDI process
 Full visibility of all your data

Request A Demo

  EDI HeadQuarters®
A Robust EDI Solution For Complete Control

 Manage your EDI entirely in-house
 On-premise or hosted
 Unlimited transaction volume
 Many trading partners
 Enterprise Level Offering

Learn More

  intelligentXchange®
EDI Visibility Layer That Clips on to Your Current System

 Full visibility of related documents
 Human-readable EDI data
 Accessible EDI for other departments
 Web-based cloud solution

Learn More






Want more information about MX?

							Click Here						




 

































		EDI Software for EDI Mapping, Translation, and Integration	















































 



















Call an EDI Expert at: (877) 334-9650
Contact Us






toggle menu

menu



EDI Products

EDI Products
Find My Product
Request a Demo
Product Comparison Chart
EDI HQ: EDI Software
AS2 Complete: AS2 Software
EDI MX: Managed EDI
EDI PX: Web-based EDI
IntelligentXchange: Analytics


EDI Services

EDI Services
Training

1EDI University


EDI Consulting

Quickstart EDI
Migration Planning


Customer Support

Support Resources


ERP Integrations
Trading Partner Integrations


Industries

Industries
CPG Manufacturing
CPG Retail
Logistics and Distribution
Transportation
Manufacturing
Healthcare
Business Services


Knowledge Center

Knowledge Center
What is EDI?
What is AS2?
Buyer’s Guide
EDI 101 Guide
Resource Center
EDI Transactions
Case Studies
Webinars


EDI Blog
About

About
Our Story
Our Team
Careers
Become a Partner
Referral Program
Press


 





EDI Software for EDI Mapping, Translation, and Integration
 EDI headQuarters®
Take full control of your EDI with EDI Headquarters (EDI/HQ), the world’s leading EDI software solution. Simplified business processes with enhanced EDI visibility allow you to immediately satisfy your trading partner’s requirements, implement EDI, integrate your data, and elevate your mission-critical EDI relationships.
There are great differences between EDI platforms and EDI tools. Choosing the EDI solution that is right for you is imperative to a successful EDI implementation that satisfies both your company’s unique requirements and business rules.
Watch Our Video





Close X








Achieve Full Control of Your EDI Operations with EDI HQ
EDI Trading Partner Onboarding
EDI HQ is the only EDI software package in the industry that automatically sets up and configures your trading partners. All it takes is one click to confirm and immediately start the flow of EDI data for new trading partners.
Complete Control of Your EDI Data
EDI HQ enables your company to receive, send, and integrate your EDI data. EDI HQ is the the market leader for ease-of-use, powerful, and seamless integration into your critical business infrastructure. From mapping to managing the flow of EDI data, you can become fully self-sufficient with HQ.
Deployment Options
Choose to completely manage your HQ infrastructure or allow us to host it for you.







Flexibility to Integrate on Your Terms
EDI Data Mapping
Leverage EDI HQ’s full-featured EDI data mapping software to transform your EDI data to suit your individualized requirements. Changes can be made quickly and easily with our intuitive interface that makes mapping your EDI data a snap.
EDI Integration Options
The EDI HQ data mapper provides completely flexible integration options that include fixed length flat files, XML, CSV, direct SQL, and any other integration method that your company needs.
Incorporate Business Logic
Augment maps with an unlimited amount of custom business logic that allows you to control the flow of EDI data.  Three decades of continual enhancements have made the EDI HQ data mapper the industry leader for fast, efficient, and powerful EDI data transformation







EDI HQ’s Dashboard that Provides Complete Visibility and Data Management
Your EDI Dashboard
EDI HQ’s fully-tailored operations dashboard gives you immediate insight into the health of your business relationships.
Alerting
Establish the alerts and thresholds you need to monitor and manage by exception.
EDI Research Capabilities
Advanced research capabilities allow you to quickly find the information you need.







Scalable EDI Solution Supported by EDI Experts
Scalable Solution
Whether you’re onboarding your first or 500th trading partner, EDI HQ is designed to exceed your performance expectations.
Over 25 Years of EDI Experience
Leverage our 25 years of EDI experience and our longstanding relationships with many commercial back-office systems including Oracle, SAP and Microsoft Dynamics.
Expert EDI Training
Quickly come up to speed with our in-person or web-based training conducted by our in-house experts.








"I’ve actually doubled my productivity without it costing us any more than what we were paying originally, and the level of service we get is 10 times better.”
— John Mitterko, Vice President of IT, World and Main
Download Case Study




EDI HQ is the most powerful EDI Software on the market.

	﻿

Compare HQ To Our Other EDI Products

  partnerXchange®
A Web Based EDI Solution For Small Businesses

 Completely Web-Based
 Review and Respond to customer documents
 Create ship notices and print labels

Learn More

  managedXchange®
An Outsourced EDI Solution Great For Any Size Business

 Outsource your EDI
 Cloud based solution, no infrastructure required
 24/7 monitoring of EDI process
 Full visibility of all your data

Learn More

  EDI HeadQuarters®
A Robust EDI Solution For Complete Control

 Manage your EDI entirely in-house
 On-premise or hosted
 Unlimited transaction volume
 Many trading partners
 Enterprise Level Offering

Request A Demo

  intelligentXchange®
EDI Visibility Layer That Clips on to Your Current System

 Full visibility of related documents
 Human-readable EDI data
 Accessible EDI for other departments
 Web-based cloud solution

Learn More






Get more information on EDI HQ

							Click Here						




 

































		EDI Software for EDI Mapping, Translation, and Integration	















































 



















Call an EDI Expert at: (877) 334-9650
Contact Us






toggle menu

menu



EDI Products

EDI Products
Find My Product
Request a Demo
Product Comparison Chart
EDI HQ: EDI Software
AS2 Complete: AS2 Software
EDI MX: Managed EDI
EDI PX: Web-based EDI
IntelligentXchange: Analytics


EDI Services

EDI Services
Training

1EDI University


EDI Consulting

Quickstart EDI
Migration Planning


Customer Support

Support Resources


ERP Integrations
Trading Partner Integrations


Industries

Industries
CPG Manufacturing
CPG Retail
Logistics and Distribution
Transportation
Manufacturing
Healthcare
Business Services


Knowledge Center

Knowledge Center
What is EDI?
What is AS2?
Buyer’s Guide
EDI 101 Guide
Resource Center
EDI Transactions
Case Studies
Webinars


EDI Blog
About

About
Our Story
Our Team
Careers
Become a Partner
Referral Program
Press


 





EDI Software for EDI Mapping, Translation, and Integration
 EDI headQuarters®
Take full control of your EDI with EDI Headquarters (EDI/HQ), the world’s leading EDI software solution. Simplified business processes with enhanced EDI visibility allow you to immediately satisfy your trading partner’s requirements, implement EDI, integrate your data, and elevate your mission-critical EDI relationships.
There are great differences between EDI platforms and EDI tools. Choosing the EDI solution that is right for you is imperative to a successful EDI implementation that satisfies both your company’s unique requirements and business rules.
Watch Our Video





Close X








Achieve Full Control of Your EDI Operations with EDI HQ
EDI Trading Partner Onboarding
EDI HQ is the only EDI software package in the industry that automatically sets up and configures your trading partners. All it takes is one click to confirm and immediately start the flow of EDI data for new trading partners.
Complete Control of Your EDI Data
EDI HQ enables your company to receive, send, and integrate your EDI data. EDI HQ is the the market leader for ease-of-use, powerful, and seamless integration into your critical business infrastructure. From mapping to managing the flow of EDI data, you can become fully self-sufficient with HQ.
Deployment Options
Choose to completely manage your HQ infrastructure or allow us to host it for you.







Flexibility to Integrate on Your Terms
EDI Data Mapping
Leverage EDI HQ’s full-featured EDI data mapping software to transform your EDI data to suit your individualized requirements. Changes can be made quickly and easily with our intuitive interface that makes mapping your EDI data a snap.
EDI Integration Options
The EDI HQ data mapper provides completely flexible integration options that include fixed length flat files, XML, CSV, direct SQL, and any other integration method that your company needs.
Incorporate Business Logic
Augment maps with an unlimited amount of custom business logic that allows you to control the flow of EDI data.  Three decades of continual enhancements have made the EDI HQ data mapper the industry leader for fast, efficient, and powerful EDI data transformation







EDI HQ’s Dashboard that Provides Complete Visibility and Data Management
Your EDI Dashboard
EDI HQ’s fully-tailored operations dashboard gives you immediate insight into the health of your business relationships.
Alerting
Establish the alerts and thresholds you need to monitor and manage by exception.
EDI Research Capabilities
Advanced research capabilities allow you to quickly find the information you need.







Scalable EDI Solution Supported by EDI Experts
Scalable Solution
Whether you’re onboarding your first or 500th trading partner, EDI HQ is designed to exceed your performance expectations.
Over 25 Years of EDI Experience
Leverage our 25 years of EDI experience and our longstanding relationships with many commercial back-office systems including Oracle, SAP and Microsoft Dynamics.
Expert EDI Training
Quickly come up to speed with our in-person or web-based training conducted by our in-house experts.








"I’ve actually doubled my productivity without it costing us any more than what we were paying originally, and the level of service we get is 10 times better.”
— John Mitterko, Vice President of IT, World and Main
Download Case Study




EDI HQ is the most powerful EDI Software on the market.

	﻿

Compare HQ To Our Other EDI Products

  partnerXchange®
A Web Based EDI Solution For Small Businesses

 Completely Web-Based
 Review and Respond to customer documents
 Create ship notices and print labels

Learn More

  managedXchange®
An Outsourced EDI Solution Great For Any Size Business

 Outsource your EDI
 Cloud based solution, no infrastructure required
 24/7 monitoring of EDI process
 Full visibility of all your data

Learn More

  EDI HeadQuarters®
A Robust EDI Solution For Complete Control

 Manage your EDI entirely in-house
 On-premise or hosted
 Unlimited transaction volume
 Many trading partners
 Enterprise Level Offering

Request A Demo

  intelligentXchange®
EDI Visibility Layer That Clips on to Your Current System

 Full visibility of related documents
 Human-readable EDI data
 Accessible EDI for other departments
 Web-based cloud solution

Learn More






Get more information on EDI HQ

							Click Here						




 

































		AS2 Software and Solutions for Data Encryption | 1EDISource	











































 



















Call an EDI Expert at: (877) 334-9650
Contact Us






toggle menu

menu



EDI Products

EDI Products
Find My Product
Request a Demo
Product Comparison Chart
EDI HQ: EDI Software
AS2 Complete: AS2 Software
EDI MX: Managed EDI
EDI PX: Web-based EDI
IntelligentXchange: Analytics


EDI Services

EDI Services
Training

1EDI University


EDI Consulting

Quickstart EDI
Migration Planning


Customer Support

Support Resources


ERP Integrations
Trading Partner Integrations


Industries

Industries
CPG Manufacturing
CPG Retail
Logistics and Distribution
Transportation
Manufacturing
Healthcare
Business Services


Knowledge Center

Knowledge Center
What is EDI?
What is AS2?
Buyer’s Guide
EDI 101 Guide
Resource Center
EDI Transactions
Case Studies
Webinars


EDI Blog
About

About
Our Story
Our Team
Careers
Become a Partner
Referral Program
Press


 


AS2 Complete – Data Encryption Software

AS2 Complete is the secure solution for your data encryption needs.

AS2 communications made effortless. Establish a secure connection quickly and simply, and begin sending and receiving data with your AS2 partners immediately. AS2 Complete is our advanced software that complies with AS2 standards making it easy for you to communicate secure EDI and other data, create and manage certificates, handle data encryption and decryption and more. From one partner or even 100, AS2 Complete is the easy and
reliable way to share EDI files with your trading partners.
Check out our Getting Started Guide (PDF) to learn more.

Our AS2 Software Enables You to do the Following


Easily set up and manage trading partners
Quickly generate certificates
Respond and comply with your customers’ requirements/initiatives
Manage messages automatically, with alerts and logs keeping track of inbound and outbound transmissions


Features and Benefits of AS2 Complete


Quick and easy installation
Intuitive interface
Powerful search function
Full range of licensing options
Supports both message and SSL encryption
Supports up to 256 Bit Encryption (Compliant with FDA Requirements)
Eliminates Van Fees by communicating directly with your partners


AS2 Complete Technical Specifications

For more details on installation in your particular environment, contact us or call 1-877-334-9650.
PROCESSOR – 32-bit/64-bit; 2 Gigahertz or faster processor recommended
OPERATING SYSTEM – Microsoft Windows 7; Microsoft Windows 8; Microsoft Windows Server 2008; Microsoft Windows 2008 R2; Microsoft Windows 2012; Microsoft Windows 2012 R2; Microsoft Windows 2016
MEMORY – 1 Gigabyte of RAM; 2 Gigabytes or more recommended
HARD DISK – 5 Gigabytes or more recommended
PREREQUISITES – Microsoft .NET Framework 4.5.2 or higher; Internet connection with a static IP address that is accessible to the public Internet
OTHER REQUIREMENTS – Administrative access (for installation); Microsoft SQL Server 2008 or Higher (optional) including Microsoft SQL Server 2014, Microsoft SQL 2016
INTERNET – AS2 Complete requires outbound access on port 80 and 443 for licensing the software. EDI/HQ will attempt to contact the following addresses:

license.1edisource.com
license2.1edisource.com
service.1edisource.com

AS2 Complete can be configured to listen for incoming messages on any port with Port 4080 (most commonly used)


Learn More About AS2 CompleteContact us today to consult with one of our AS2 experts.
Contact Us  


 

































Edi Hienrich | 












































Edi HienrichAll posts tagged Edi Hienrich 



The ‘Greatest Show on Earth’ – Herbalife Extravaganzas 
Posted by Marco Stassen on October 21, 2012


						Posted in: News Feed.			
						Tagged: Edi Hienrich, Extravaganza, Greatest Show on Earth', Herbalife Extravaganza Cape Town, Herbalife Extravaganzas, Herbalife in EMEA, Managing Director.			
							Leave a comment



The ‘Greatest Show on Earth’ (with the exception of Herbalife Extravaganzas) came to our region last month. Thousands of elite athletes descended on London, after four years of intense preparation, to strive for the ultimate accolade in their sport – Olympic Gold. A number of those athletes have Herbalife products at the heart of their nutrition regime and their incredible testimonials are proof, at the highest level, of what our products deliver. Congratulations to all of them.
 
At a time when our inner nutrition products are at the forefront, it is important also to highlight the exciting enhancements we are making to our outer nutrition products. Our new Herbal Aloe range has been a huge success since its recent launch and to coincide with this new range, we have re-energised Total Plan with some exciting new tools and materials.
 
Our next big milestone is Extravaganza – this year we are in Barcelona, Istanbul, Kiev and Cape Town. The line up of speakers will be impressive; the training and sharing of ideas will be insightful; the lifestyle events will be fabulous; and the energy will be incredible.
 
This is such an exciting time to be at Herbalife in EMEA, so make sure you are part of this life-changing event.
 
I wish you continued success.
 

 
 
 
Edi Hienrich
Senior Vice President & Managing Director, Europe, Middle East & Africa
To become an Independent Herbalife Distributor contact Marco on +2772 292 0897 of mail me on marco@crccapetown.co.za
ALSO ON SKYPE as marco.stassen
Share this:FacebookTwitterEmailPrintLinkedInGoogleLike this:Like Loading... 




CategoriesCategories
Select Category
Balanced Meal
Competitions
Healthy Eating
Herbalife24
News Feed
Obesity
Survey’s
Uncategorized
Video’s
Weight-loss Challenge
WORK FROM HOME


  Recent Posts 

Letter to Herbalife EMEA, Africa and Southern Africa


Protected: Christmas 2013 special


Herbalife is going Places


Weight lose Challenge Starting in Goodwood


Christmas 2012 special


 Archives Archives

Select Month
 July 2013  (2)
 February 2013  (2)
 December 2012  (1)
 November 2012  (1)
 October 2012  (4)
 June 2012  (1)
 May 2012  (2)
 March 2012  (9)
 February 2012  (12)
 January 2012  (4)
 December 2011  (24)
 November 2011  (19)

Pages 
About
Contact Details
Herbalife “Our Mission – Vision – Values”
Herbalife Doctors
Press Room
Sports Nutrition

Blogroll

CRC
FREE ONLINE CLOUD
Google Search
Herbalife 24
Marco Stassen on Facebook


NEWS

CASA Herbalife


The Nutrition Way 

The Nutrition Way

Twitter UpdatesError: Twitter did not respond. Please wait a few minutes and refresh this page.













Post to



Cancel







 







Send to Email Address

Your Name

Your Email Address






Cancel

				Post was not sent - check your email addresses!			

				Email check failed, please try again			

				Sorry, your blog cannot share posts by email.			











 
 
%d bloggers like this:










































































































































		EDI Guide to Finding Your Right EDI Solution | 1EDISource	








































 



















Call an EDI Expert at: (877) 334-9650
Contact Us






toggle menu

menu



EDI Products

EDI Products
Find My Product
Request a Demo
Product Comparison Chart
EDI HQ: EDI Software
AS2 Complete: AS2 Software
EDI MX: Managed EDI
EDI PX: Web-based EDI
IntelligentXchange: Analytics


EDI Services

EDI Services
Training

1EDI University


EDI Consulting

Quickstart EDI
Migration Planning


Customer Support

Support Resources


ERP Integrations
Trading Partner Integrations


Industries

Industries
CPG Manufacturing
CPG Retail
Logistics and Distribution
Transportation
Manufacturing
Healthcare
Business Services


Knowledge Center

Knowledge Center
What is EDI?
What is AS2?
Buyer’s Guide
EDI 101 Guide
Resource Center
EDI Transactions
Case Studies
Webinars


EDI Blog
About

About
Our Story
Our Team
Careers
Become a Partner
Referral Program
Press


 






EDI Buyer's Guide
1EDISource can help optimize EDI solutions for your organization. Our EDI Buyer’s Guide provides insightful resources and recommendations for evaluating your EDI infrastructure, including:

Why use EDI?
New to EDI insight and direction to increase efficiency of your current system.
Understanding all aspects of EDI: Communication, Data Management, Translation, Integration and Mapping
Finding the best EDI solution for your industry



Download Buyer's Guide




















													First Name
													*


													Last Name
													*























											Your Email

											*













											Company















											Phone Number

											*













											Why are you here ? (Choose one)
											*


--None--
Request Expert
Need EDI Solution
Education/Training
Education
Research
Beginning Research
Research for Future
Student















													Download
													
												









 










Companies Who Trust 1EDISource










 





























 

Herbalife: Edi Hienrich  - Nutraceuticals World

















































Login
Join








FOLLOW:














Subscribe Free

Magazine
eNewsletter




 Checkout











Menu 

































People In The News
Herbalife: Edi Hienrich 









Related People In The News



                                                    Herbalife Reaches Settlement with FTC for $200 Million                                                



                                                    Sabinsa to Highlight Recent Studies, New Canadian Health Claims                                                



                                                    Industry Leaders Collaborate to Develop Supplement Registry                                                



                                                    AOAC Approves Official  Methods for Aloin & Theanine                                                



                                                    Herbalife Nutrition Reveals CEO Transition Plan                                                



























12.01.09 

Herbalife Ltd., Los Angeles, CA, has named Edi Hienrich senior vice president and managing director of its Europe, Middle East and Africa region. He will be responsible for all business, strategic, sales and marketing functions across the region’s 37 markets. Mr. Hienrich is a 20-year veteran of Herbalife. He most recently served as vice president of sales for the general U.S. market.













Suggested For You 




 
Tekni-Plex Acquires BrunaSeals


 
Kate Pastor Joins Aker BioMarine as Senior Vice President of Sales


 
OmniActive’s OmniXan-RS Obtains Self-Affirmed GRAS Status







  
Jeff Harmening Named CEO of General Mills


 
Life Extension Launches Mediterranean Whole Food Blend 


 
Mixed Carotenoid Supplement May Help Obese Children


 




An Interview with Keiji Saika of Toyo Rice Corporation


 




Global Wellness Economy Estimated at $3 Trillion







  
Indian Tree Bark Extract May Improve Athletic Performance


 




Herbalife: A Nutrition Leader in Transition


 




Herbalife Nutrition Reveals CEO Transition Plan


 




AOAC Approves Official  Methods for Aloin & Theanine







  
Industry Leaders Collaborate to Develop Supplement Registry


 
Sabinsa to Highlight Recent Studies, New Canadian Health Claims


 




Herbalife Reaches Settlement with FTC for $200 Million







 













Related People In The News





Dietary Supplements





Israelsen Receives Herbal Community Builder Award

The American Botanical Council (ABC), Austin, TX, has selected Loren D. Israelsen, president of the United Natural Products Alliance (UNPA), as the recipient of its 2014 Mark Blumenthal Herbal Community Builder Award.

The award is granted annually…04.01.15 







Dietary Supplements | People News





ChromaDex Appoints Steve Allen as Chairman

ChromaDex Corp., Irvine, CA, has appointed Steve Allen as the chairman of its Board. Mr. Allen  joined the company's Board as an independent director in January 2014.
 
Mr. Allen retired from Nestlé in December 2009 a…03.06.15 







Dietary Supplements | People News | Vitamins





Vitamin Shoppe Names New Chief Executive Officer

Colin Watts will be joining Vitamin Shoppe, Inc., North Bergen, NJ, as its new chief executive officer effective April 6, 2015. Mr. Watts will also become a member of the Board of Directors. He is to succeed Tony Truesdale who announced in September…03.05.15 







 




Dietary Supplements | People News | Research





Professor Harry H.S. Fong Receives ABC’s Botanical Research Award

The American Botanical Council (ABC), Austin, TX, has named Professor Harry H.S. Fong, PhD, as the recipient of the ABC Norman R. Farnsworth Excellence in Botanical Research Award for 2014. Dr. Fong is professor emeritus of pharmacognosy in the Depar…03.03.15 







People News








NEC Names New Chief Financial Officer

Kim Crouse has been named chief financial officer of National Enzyme Company, Forsyth, MO. Ms. Crouse served as NEC’s director of finance for the past 11 years.
 
"I'm extremely excited to begin this new journey in my caree…03.03.15 







People News








Sabinsa Expands U.S. Sales Staff

Sabinsa Corporation, East Windsor, NJ, has added Rick McNail as eastern regional sales manager and Jan A. Obirek as regional sales manager – California.
 
Mr. McNailcomes to Sabinsa with extensive sales and marketing experience in the ph…03.03.15 







 




People News | Testing








Q Laboratories, Inc. Hires Chemistry Lab Supervisor

Michael Baim, PhD, has joined Q Laboratories, Inc., Cincinnati, OH, as chemistry laboratory supervisor. Dr. Baim will be responsible for the everyday operations of the Pharmaceutical & Food Chemistry labs, including analyst training, technology u…03.03.15 







People News





FDA Commissioner Dr. Margaret Hamburg Resigns

After nearly six years of service, Margaret Hamburg, MD, will step down from her role as commissioner of the U.S. Food and Drug Administration (FDA), effective at the end of March.
	 
	One of the longest serving FDA comm…03.02.15 







Digestive Health








National Enzyme Company Welcomes New President

National Enzyme Company, Forsyth, MO, has promoted Charlie Amidon to president of NEC. Mr. Amidon will continue to serve as chief operating officer in addition to his new role as president.

"Charlie has proven time and time again that th…02.25.15 







 












Algatech Appoints New CEO and Chief Scientist

Algatechnologies, (Algatech) Kibbutz Ketura, Israel, welcomed Ronnie Meninger as CEO for the company.  Mr. Hagai Stadler, of Grovepoint (Algatech's major shareholder) who served in the last two years as an interim CEO will become a director…02.24.15 







Contract Manufacturing | Delivery & Dosage Technologies








Brookfield Appoints International Sales and Marketing Manager

Brookfield Engineering Laboratories, Middleboro, MA, has hired Nilay Shah to the new position of international sales and marketing manager for laboratory products and services.
Mr. Shah’s expanded responsibilities include sales for all territo…02.24.15 







Functional Foods & Beverages





BI Nutraceuticals Adds Food Science Engineer

Michael Wagner has joined BI Nutraceuticals, Long Beach, CA, as a food science engineer. In this role, Dr. Wagner will assist in providing solutions for complex functional food formulation challenges faced by BI’s customer base and will help su…02.24.15 







People News | Testing





Alkemist Labs Adds Staff to Support Company Growth

Alkemist Labs, Costa Mesa, CA, has welcomed two new additions to its staff.

Industry veteran Paul Burns has joined the company as director of sales. With more than 10 years in technical-scientific laboratory service sales, Mr. Burns was most recen…02.11.15 







People News





Marine Ingredients Appoints COO

Manufacturers of specialty omega-3 ingredients, Mount Bethel, PA-based Marine Ingredients, has hired nutrition industry veteran David M. Barnes PhD to fulfill the role of chief operating officer.

	“Dr. Barnes brings a range of skills…02.05.15 







People News





Dr. Tina Sampalis Appointed Medical Science Liaison for Neptune

Dr. Tina Sampalis, the chief global strategic officer for Neptune Technologies & Bioressources Inc. and Acasti Pharma Inc., Laval, Québec, Canada, will be transitioning immediately to a consulting role as medical science liaison for Neptun…02.05.15 

















 

Trending



Analysis Suggests Artificial Sweeteners Associated With Increased BMI And Cardiometabolic Risk  Online Sales Of Vitamins, Minerals, Supplements Surge 20% In $13.5 Billion U.S. Market  Nutrition, Health & Wellness Industry Builds On Record Transaction Activity  ConsumerLab Finds Cadmium Contamination In Dark Chocolate And Cocoa Powders  Carlyle Group Selling Majority Control Of Nature’s Bounty Co To Investment Firm KKR   







Breaking News






BIO-CAT Expands Sales Department, Hires Regulatory Associate


fairlife Introduces fairlife SuperKids Ultra-Filtered Milk with DHA


NutraGlow Introduces Sublingual Super B


AstaPure Astaxanthin Approved by Anvisa Brazil


Study Confirms Advantra Z Suppresses Appetite





View Breaking News >










CURRENT ISSUE



July/August 2017

 How Trust  Sells Dietary Supplements
 Packaging Considerations for Dietary Supplements
 Omega-3 Encapsulation: Challenges & Opportunities
 Hard Capsule Technologies  Address Consumer Concerns
 Skin Health: New Audiences &  Innovative Deliveries Drive Growth	
 Renewed Perspectives on Herbal & Traditional Products
 Reviewing the State of the Herbs & Botanicals Market 

View More >


















Copyright © 2017 Rodman Media. All rights reserved. Use of this constitutes acceptance of our privacy policy 
        The material on this site may not be reproduced, distributed, transmitted, or otherwise used, except with the prior written permission of Rodman Media.









 




	Search Engine Marketing (SEM) - Bing Ads








































































































Skip to content











Sign upSign in


 


















You run your business. We'll help find your customers.
Bing Ads can help build your business and drive your success. Spend $25 and get $100 in advertising credit.†

†Offer details




Get $100 in search advertising when you spend $25 in Bing Ads.







Coupon code class

First name:

Last name:

Email:

Your website URL

Business phone



*Required
Microsoft may contact you to provide updates and special offers about Bing Ads. You can unsubscribe at any time. To learn more you can read the privacy statement.
Type the code from the image:

Enter security code:







             























×
Get $100 in search advertising when you spend $25 in Bing Ads.


†Offer Details: Offer expires December 31, 2017.  Valid only for new Bing Ads customers who are first party recipients of the offer email. A new Bing Ads customer is one that has not advertised on Bing Ads before. Enter promotional coupon code and spend $25 (applies to threshold and prepaid accounts) to receive $100 in Bing Ads credits. Limit one promotion code per new Bing Ads customer. Promotional code must be redeemed within thirty (30) days of Bing Ads new customer account creation. Ad campaign costs accrued before receiving a credit, as well as costs accrued after all credits are used, will be charged to the payment method associated with the Bing Ads account. If customer payment fails, the coupon amount will not be applied.  Ads will continue to run and accrue costs after any promotional credit has been used up. Any portion of the credit not used within ninety (90) days of credit redemption will expire and can't be carried over even if the Bing Ads Customer switches their payment method. Offer valid only to residents of the United States. In order for the offer to be valid, a form of payment must be entered into your account prior to redemption of the promotional code and prior to your account going live to take advantage of the credit. This offer may not be combined with any other offer, promotional code coupon or discount, separated, redeemed for cash, transferred, sold, or bartered. Microsoft, in its sole discretion, can close your account for any suspected coupon abuse. Refund of the $25 is not permitted.  See Bing Ads Terms and Conditions for more details at sign-up. Other terms and conditions may apply.  Microsoft reserves the right to cancel, change, or suspend this offer at any time without notice.









See how Bing Ads works



Customers search


Customers see your ad


Customers contact you


Watch how Bing Ads works  
 








×
How Bing Ads works

















Help more customers find you
See how Bing can attract customers your Google AdWords campaigns can't.

Reach 137 million searchers on the Bing Network.1
Tap into 32.9% of the search marketplace.2
Get in front of searchers who spend 16 percent more than the average internet searcher.2











Powerful network. Powerful benefits.



Reach across devicesConnect with customers looking for your business anytime, anywhere, on any device.


Go global or localReach people in the Bing Network everywhere or focus on cities, counties and areas within a certain distance from your business.


Easy to importIf you're already using another product like Google Adwords, it's easy to pull that campaign into Bing Ads.








You control your costs

 Free sign-upJoin Bing Ads for free and control your account at every step.


 Only pay for clicksPay just when customers click on your ad. No click, no charge.


 No minimum feeStart advertising with a budget that works best for your business.









 



The advantage we gain in cost per click gives us a great return on investment — more than 35 percent better than Google AdWords.
Scott Redgate, search engine marketing manager — CJ Pony Parts
By using Bing Ads features like Image Extensions and Sitelink Extensions, this auto parts retailer races to convert customers and beat its competition.

 Read about driving more conversions







 



We might not get as much of the volume as with Google AdWords, but the volume of the traffic that we get converts really well at a lower cost.
Scott Schult, Executive Vice President of Marketing — Myrtle Beach Area Convention and Visitors Bureau
The Myrtle Beach Area Convention and Visitors Bureau uses Bing Ads to drive site traffic and tourism at lower cost.

 Read about getting better ROI








Better results for less cost. That's as simple as I can make it. If I look at the quality of the traffic we get for the dollars we spend on Bing Ads, our ROI is fantastic.
Alex Littlewood, CEO   Motoroso
Motoroso, a market network for auto enthusiasts, gets better results for less cost and reaches a high-value audience with Bing Ads.

 Read about attracting quality traffic



 









Import your AdWords campaigns

Save time by importing your Google AdWords campaigns into Bing Ads to get ads live quickly.


Sign in with your Microsoft account (or create one) to get started on Bing Ads.


From within the Bing Ads interface, select the Import from Google AdWords option.


Enter your Google AdWords credentials and select the campaign you want to import.










Preview your ad

Get found online with search engine marketing. Make the most of your marketing dollars and drive customers to your business.
See how Bing Ads can work for you




















Get started today
Give us a few details about your business to create a Bing Ads account and get it up and running.


  
Sign up
Get started with Bing Ads 
Signing up is always free.













FAQ


Is Bing Ads right for me?

Is Bing Ads right for my business?
All types of businesses find value and success with Bing Ads. Whether you're focused on local calls and foot traffic, or want to drive traffic to your website from across the country or around the world. Bing Ads has solutions for you.
I already appear in search results for free. Why should I pay for advertising?
Your current customers may search for your business by name, aiming it easy to find you in search results. But customers you've yet to reach are more likely searching for general terms that wouldn't necessarily bring up your business in search results. Advertising next to relevant Bing search results puts your business front and center with interested customers you otherwise might not reach.
What is the difference between SEO and SEM? Which one is right for me?
Search engine optimization (SEO) is adjusting your website to improve your natural ranking in search results. You cannot pay to improve your website ranking on Bing or Yahoo, thus we often refer to these results and unpaid or "organic" search results.

	Clicks from SEO are free. But SEO also requires technical expertise and involves some factors over which you have only limited control.

	Search engine marketing (SEM) is paid advertising that appears next to or above unpaid (or "organic") search results. These paid ads are purchased through Bing Ads.

	You pay for SEM clicks. But SEM gives you more control over when your website appears on results pages and you decide how much you want to pay. And you can measure which ads are working and quickly improve your results.

	You don't have to choose between SEO and SEM. You can do both!
If my time is limited, should I still try Bing ads?
Yes! Call a Bing Ads specialist at 877-635-3561*and we’ll set up your first campaign for you for free. We’ll give you tips on getting the most out of your ads and set you up for success. We’re here to help.




About Bing Ads

Where does my ad appear?
Your ads could appear on the top or to the right of Bing, Yahoo, and MSN search results. And you can choose to target your ads to different geographic regions, times or days of the week, and even demographics.
What determines my ad position?
Bing Ads is a pay-per-click (PPC) advertising system. You bid based on how much you are willing to pay per each click on your ad. Because webpages have a limited number of places to show ads, we auction those spaces. You are bidding against other advertisers to get your ads into the space you want. So if you bid on the keyword "shoe", you will have to beat the bids of the other advertisers who are also bidding on "shoe." You determine how much you are willing to bid.
	Your ad position is based on several things, including:
	
How closely your ad and website fit with the terms that are searched (relevance).
How your bid compares to other bids in the Bing Ads auction.
How strongly your ad has performed in the past and how often it has been clicked (click-through rate).

	The stronger you are in these areas, the better your chances of winning the top ad position.




How to use Bing Ads

How can I use Bing Ads to drive more people to my website?
Here are some tips to get better results:
	
Review your budget and bid strategy. If your ad keeps pausing, your budget limit may be set too low. Competitive bids help your ad stay in a strong position to catch eyes and get more clicks to your website.
Expand your targeting, both for location and for devices (computer, mobile and tablet).
Make sure your ads and website are relevant to the keywords you bid on. Would someone searching your terms expect to see and ad for your business?


How can I keep my costs down?
While your first instinct may be to lower your budget, first try lowering your maximum bids. Yes, this could mean fewer customers visit your site. But if you increase your quality score and build ads with a strong performance history, you may be able to win a good ad position with a lower bid. That would lower your cost=per-click and help stretch your budget.
How do I know if Bing Ads is working?
View a wide range of performance trends in your account to quickly see key stats: ad clicks, the number of times your ad appeared (impressions), spend, average cost-per-click, click-through rate, average ad position, cost per acquisition, and conversions. You can also run performance reports to get insights into how well your campaigns are doing.
Can I run more than one ad?
Yes! In fact, we encourage it. Only one ad will show at a time but running multiple ads lets you test different approaches to see what's working best with your target customers. Frequently, businesses try out different ads for specific products or pages.




Getting started with Bing Ads

How do I get started?
Sign up for Bing Ads
Which keywords should I choose?
You have a few options to help choose your keywords. First you'll want to think of the terms one of your customers might use to search for your products and offerings. Those search terms are a great starting point. Then you can use tools right in your account to find more keywords. Within Bing Ads, click Campaigns on the top of the page. Click the Keywords tab, and then click Add Keywords. This will let you:
	
Search for new keywords based on one you enter.
Search a website for keywords.
Search your destination URLs for keywords.


How can I write a good ad?
Here are a few tips that can help make your ad stand out.
	
Keep your ads relevant. One way to improve relevance is to use your customer's most popular search terms in your ad titles and txt.
Describe what sets your product apart.
Use your customers' language. Use words and writing tone that are likely to attract your typical customer.
Be specific. This clearer and more specific your offering, the better. For example, rather than "big discount," specify and exact percentage, such as "50 percent off."
Give customers a reason to click your ad right now. Offer a specific call to action, such as encouraging customers to request a brochure or consultation, download a free e-book, subscribe to a newsletter, or take advantage of a limited-time discount.























Sign up with Bing Ads to get started





































